Seems like a long time ago long before the stars were torn down.
So there you have it!! Ton's of super easy and simple ways to create the ultimate play zone! And it can totally be done on any budget with a little creative energy! And do you see why IHeart labels oh so very much? I mean, they save EVERYONE so much time and keep the space so super tidy, it's barely a believable story!
6. Survival Kits
Baekhee's dance team does a wicked-awesome "snake" themed dance that looks cooler than their Swan Lake counterparts and lands them a 1st place trophy. Hyemi's goal for her bird team was 3rd place and they achieved it, yay! But Baekhee doesn't understand why Hyemi is not jealous of her win.
Just three months after Random House’s announcement, Amazon had all but declared war on the six unruly members of its book supply chain. Jeff Bezos had $6 billion in cash, the patience to absorb losses for years, and a former Big Six chief to lead the fight. The long-running behind-the-scenes battle for control of the publishing industry had finally broken into full public view.
I have learned so much the last two years about what works for me and what doesn't
Our current statistical systems are still heavily dependent on industrial ways of thinking and working. They were developed in the middle and late 20th century, long before the web made a deep impact on society. The systems reflect what I would call an industrial model of statistics. They aim at standardized mass collection of a limited number of statistical variables.
6:00. So we went back to the compound and waited. The materials finally arrived
The route home was slightly uphill, but with the wind behind us it was fine. As I started on the last mile I could feel myself wanting to run on so I opened up a little, leaving hubbie behind, but close enough for me to stop and administer whatever first aid a hernia stricken patient might need!
This particular tree has two of these growths occurring along its trunk. With a little research, I learned that these are called “burls”, and Wikipedia describes them as follows:
Thirty percent of the younger crowd are fine dumping someone by telephone — versus 16 percent of the older folks. (The man who did that to me at 4:30 during my workday does have a special spot in hell.)
My suspicion is that every time Laura Ingraham speaks in public, people have to light a match afterwards. Witness Ingraham saying on Fox,
There is now clear evidence of a break of the recent down trend and I’d say that for the moment the Aussie is trapped in a range that is defined by the 1.0200/50 low and the 1.0850ish high recently. It is overbought at present on the hourlies as you can see in the short term chart but for the moment it probably has the daily momentum and equity market sentiment on its side.
“Miss Ann tells me that you have some unfinished business that has kept you here. She also tells me that you’re close to finding out what it is. I strongly suggest you see to that immediately. You will probably see you light again, your invitation to Heaven, when you’ve learned all you seek. Please don’t hesitate. Go to it.”
600g sweet potato
When a journalist seeks the truth and finds someone has been lying to the press, what is to be done? Reporting the truth whether it is good or bad should be reported.
Kerry, as always, thanks for the non-Cards cards.
I want to be able to dance like them. Imagine living in a time when stereo was actually a novel invention? Absolutely crazy to think about today when FLAC, terabytes of music and tiny mp3 players have become normal.
Edmondson: The nipple ring was a new horizon in British slapstick I thought.
I might have been wearing jeans and a hoodie but I am actually a well-informed, educated woman. Would she have treated me different if I was wearing a power suit with an expensive handbag? As a mother, I have made an informed decision for my children. And one I do not regret. One that I believe in. What is worst in the medical system is the lack of logic and science from a discipline that claims both. What is worst in the medical system is abuse of power and authority to forward a particular agenda. I think this push on more and more vaccinations comes from the interests of pharmaceutical companies and not scientific evidence or logic. I think that if we suddenly stopped immunizing we might be surprised at what doesn't show up. I also believe that vaccinations have their place. Developing countries without sanitation and clean water and good nutrition might benefit. I am far more curious about the damage being done to immune systems with all these vaccinations - basically man-made immunities. I think there is no substitute for strengthening the immune system through fresh air, good wholesome, non-processed foods and getting sick once and awhile. And yes, I've had: mumps, both kinds of measles, chicken pox, whooping cough and hepatitis A.
The Village Lake Las Vegas, Buckbean Brewing Company and New Vista Community host “Brews Best Village Beer Fest” on Saturday, Nov. 13, from 1 p.m. to 6 p.m. Tickets are available at the event for $25 per person with proceeds benefiting New Vista Community or can be pre-purchased at www.NewVistaCommunity.org.
Take my attempt at a story that I’ve been plugging away at. It’s about a Chinese Hero who is helping two people escape a monster. Ok, that doesn’t seem so unusual as a plot device. It also doesn’t seem too uncommon that my hero is a handsome warrior bad-ass who makes others look pretty fucking stupid as he kicks the shit out of them. He might as well have the sword that says “bad motherfucker” on the blade in Chinese. I love to kick ass with this guy. Anyone who likes action and adventure will probably find something to enjoy in this book one day.
Well if so then you're in luck, because it's the first Saturday of the month -
We chose this particular Tuesday because the weather was forecasted to be a beautiful fall day with a high of 79. The week before, we went ahead and took the day off, anticipating a nice day. As the week progressed, the forecast got higher and high. With a high of 84, we figured it was still ok, and stuck with the plan. By the time Monday rolled around though, it was projected to get up to 88, and we weren't as stoked about the weather.
Saturday, April 23rd
If your husband has a porn addiction, you're going to be angry when you learn. You'll feel disgusted, ashamed, and probably a little vengeful. That's only natural. But when you calm down, try, as much as you can, to also feel a bit of sympathy. Listen to your husband's heart. If he is repentant, but doesn't know how to stop, then help him. If he isn't repentant, then lay down some pretty firm rules and an ultimatum. A marriage can't survive a porn addiction long-term. It is cheating, whether he admits it or not. He may not think of it that way, but it is stealing his sexual interest from you, and it is undermining the whole basis for your marriage.
With Let’s Spend the Night Together, the viewer gets exactly what he or she would expect: a filmed concert. The “story” of this concert is told through the various editing of clips from two separate concerts, as well as a few behind-the-scenes clips. The two concerts in question are from Sun Devil Stadium in Phoenix, Arizona, and the Brendan Byrne Arena in Meadowlands, New Jersey. Most of the film is watching Mick Jagger get crazy on stage, dancing his heart away. There are only a few clips that show the band backstage, before they perform, which is disappointing because these are the most interesting of the clips in the film, and help break the monotony of just watching Jagger and the rest of the band. For hardcore Stones fans, watching Jagger kick around the stage for an hour and a half will be a blast, but for casual audiences, Let’s Spend the Night Together can get boring quickly.
NO WAY!
The scripture didn’t say we will not have enemies; but it says anybody who declares himself as our enemy shall fall for our sake: “Behold, they shall surely gather together, but not by me: whosoever shall gather together against thee shall fall for thy sake” (Isaiah 54:15). Those that gather to wreck havoc in your life, have only gathered for their fall.
Mix together 1 chopped red pepper, 2 chopped jalapenos (unseeded), 1 can of corn, 16 oz fat-free cream cheese (softened), and 1 packet Hidden Valley Ranch dip seasoning mix. Serve with crackers or cut up veggies. Delicious!!
Then I heard about how much Frenchy hates know-it-alls who think they know everything about dogs, but who don’t know anything. I heard how he hates to be told garbage about his own dog when he knows better. Frenchy summed up his annoyance with tall guy in a single expression, “He may az well stay hohm and watch TV, ffuuuu(k).”
I texted him, left him three voicemails and tweeted him, and he never got back to me—so I consulted some grammar gurus instead.
All in all this is a nice headset thats worth the money. If you’re looking for a comfortable headset that will reduce the background noise of the cube farm you work in, and play back ground music to mute them out when your off the phone, this headset will work for you.
The Liurong Temple is an important center of Buddhism. Hundreds of people have come to the complex today, which covers an acre or more and includes a dozen buildings and shrines. Scattered around the grounds are six ancient banyan trees, revered by the original monks here and most of which have been replaced by descendant trees. So it is the 6-Banyan Pagoda, in a way.
And nestle into the ice
BRISTOL: So my unicorn name is gonna be Gleena…
I love how the cities are carefully placed and the font is just large enough to squeeze in among neighboring towns. Banda Prints offers customization, too. I know I'll want my hometown listed among the others on the map when I order my Washington State silhouette!
The exact role that cognitive function has in alcoholism treatment success is unclear. Structural and functional imaging, as well as more specific cognitive tests, may provide scientists with the tools needed to reveal subtle relationships between alcohol-related cognitive impairment and recovery. Meanwhile, certain conclusions can be drawn from existing research that help to explain how cognitive function may influence alcoholism treatment:
4 oz linguine or thin-style spaghetti
Joyce: It doesn't do anything. ... Oh wait, there's a dropdown thingy.
Zeynep Mine Derince, Marmara University, Turkey: Reflections on Teaching Practices through Conditionings in Turkey
At least, Brulee had heard that others had made homes in those cities, and in smaller towns and villages across Azeroth. She felt no need to leave the Exodar. She had everything she needed here. She was not the only one who read these books. Books came in from around the globe to their library; she was merely providing a service by catagorizing them, one by one, in her free time, aka the time not spent helping to repair the Exodar or otherwise continue to help her people with the rebuilding process of the Exodar.
Omit the oil (though why would you want to?!) for 132 cal and only 1 g fat per serving.
But it comes down to resources, and knowing where to look.
probably look like in another 10 years and the
In the end, Montgomery was portrayed as an ally of those "who have million-dollar brownstones and want to preserve their exclusive neighborhood."
Paper: Lost & Found 2 Sunshine (My Mind's Eye), Dark Chocolate, Rustic Cream (Papertrey Ink)
7. Place more Matzah on top of the cheese, spinach and sauce layer. Repeat layering process until the casserole dish is full. Finish by placing more sauce on top layer, and sprinkling with Parmesan cheese.
I hope this one pleases you as much as it does me, and I really want to see what you can do with our "Get Well" challenge at The Perfect Sentiment this week. Come play along -- you could be a winner and get some fabulous digis from Shelly's Images.
Anywho, an update on our current life... Eric will most likely be going to Haiti sometime in the first week of March. If he goes, he will be gone for 60-90 days. He has two work ups coming up as well, each a month long. One in July, and one in November. He also has a deployment to Afghanistan scheduled for January of 2011. Needless to say, we both have our hands full for the next year or so. Also, as you all may know... we are expecting a baby! :) According to the conception date and hormone levels, I am 7 weeks and 3 days along now. I have an ultrasound on February 26th, so we will know more then. Pregnancy is kicking my butt, that's for sure! I'm showing, but only a little. I have morning sickness like no other, and I'm constantly tired. It seems a trip to the store, or up and down the stairs for that matter, completely exhausts me. But it's okay, it's all worth it in the end!
But we’ll get to that moment when they get here later.
Ronan takes note that the color of the Car is completely white, with white leather interior, and the girl is wearing all white as well.
I'm so glad they had fun, but I'm also glad that they were pretty happy to see me at pick up time :)
One of my new favorites to watch is The Sing Off. These people have major talent and a capella is awesome! This was my favorite performance from the first episode.
We flocked there during the summer, overfilling the back seats of our cars. Flush with our allowance or babysitting money we bartered for hand painted velvet bulls, brightly colored paper flowers, and whatever else caught our eye while we were there. Tijuana, though potentially dangerous to some extent on the average day, during cinco de Mayo bringing with it more people, more drinking, and more potential for disaster was a time I was never permitted to experience there. Parents, at least when I was growing up, considered it off limits for pubescent young women while the celebration was in full bloom.
Looking for a great bread recipe to accompany all those hearty soups you are making this winter? 101 Cookbooks has a nice recipe for Oat Soda Bread.
If you received a nasty comment on a piece you’ve posted, would you delete it? What would your response be to a troll?
I loved this movie when I was 12 and in my mind I put it right up there with Back to the Future and the Goonies, so when I saw the whole Sandlot Trilogy on sale for six buckers I thought I was picking up a bargain.
immediately following our conversation with Michael Gerrard, we will hear from a range of speakers—some via Skype—discussing sovereignty, governance, and the nation-state itself in a range of geographic and spatial scenarios, from the Arctic to the Internet.
Although post-mortem photographs make up a large group of 19th century American artifacts, it was only until recent years the photos have been brought out into the open, according to Burns' research.
xo xo Full Time Gangsta
And as far as I can see, the lawyer is using the girlfriend’s age as a pretext to manipulate the whole case: We must take her word, even though she will not speak publicly, and we don’t even know who the hell she is. (Listen to the children!) We must take her word, even though we don’t have her word, as opposed to the claims by the attorney as to what transpired during the call. We must take her word, because she has been so traumatized by her experience. And even if she does speak publicly, we have only her word (or the words written for her) for what happened.
It all started with the images which had a purplish hue to them. After some inking and distressing, I stitched them onto contrasting mats. And then, it's just a matter of selecting matching papers and embellies.
Three young heirs, imprisoned by an unscrupulous uncle, escaped—to the sea, to the streets, to faraway battle—awaiting the day when they would return to reclaim their birthright.
To sweeten the Hop, the fabulous sponsors are offering a gift for you! For every comment you leave on the blogs in the Hop, you’ll be entered to win a prize pack from one of the participating manufacturer sponsors!
Limbaugh also said cities like Flint were "down the tubes long ago."
I want to sit on the floor near the band, right in front of the musicians. The music will be so loud and the acoustics and wooden floor will all work together and you end up being able to “feel” the music there.
The perfectionist says not to go running until I can run every single step of every single mile I attempt.
8pm: Dinner (usually with friends)
We also got a growler of the Rejection and it was actually quite a bit better in a full glass. The flavors have a chance to grow on you and really come into their own. Definitely made me think of a Belgian porter with the clove sweetness blending well with the roast.
Bright blessings to you.
Whoever won the week before last's Haiku Monday contest didn't want to host, so I will do so for the April 16th edition. The theme is SMOKE. The usual 5-7-5 rule. Haiku that are adjudged to be two different thoughts separated by a kireji will be favored somewhat.
His most logical decision now would be to bring the odds decidedly back to his favor. The mental image of the .12 gauge shotgun, flawlessly polished and resting inside the tomb of the foyer closet, sprung to mind.
1 week…sheesh.
Another thing that happened today.... Elizabeth stopped by my office for something for her lips.... they were feeling a bit dry. I offered her some petroleum jelly, but she declined. So, I checked my makeup bag and found these.......
Of course, one rarely has the time to learn all of them, but during the course of the study it would be quite beneficial to know them, not only because of the local customs and rituals, but also because of the lack of good translations (or sadly, too often, lack of any translations) of chronicles and papers. However, all Slavic languages are quite similar one to another, and if researcher knows at least one of them he or she will have little difficulty to understand at least other languages from the same group and quite possibly the languages from other groups. I hope the speakers of other Slavic languages would forgive me for this recommendation which is based solely on practicability and personal experience of studying Slavic religion, mythology and customs of Slavic people. Perhaps some of them would make different choice based on their experience or affinities.
We also passed through Tianquan, another town along the way where, I read, several generators have been built inside a nature reserve.
I know it’s been a spell since I updated my blog, but I’ve been busy on a couple of fronts.
1 helping
New Old Lompco Pub & Grill
The floors are finished---just some wall touch up still being done, To cover up some of my touch up painting I plan to make a gallery wall of some of my hooked rugs on the wall going up the stairway. I wil post a picture when I get it done. The carpet runner on the stairs is still waiting to be laid next Monday---so I do not want to hang anything until that is finished.
a) the contents of our mind (culture), the very way we think and what we think about, come from our brain’s interaction with the umbworld (nature).
It may indeed be a Lonely Place To Die, but when loneliness looks so bloody gorgeous, company is overrated.
Frosted Toast Crunch Prize Pack: Young Couponer
The lambs have laid down with the sheep.
What should happen this year:
However, he said Fiji will continue on its path to a new future just as it has- on its own accord regardless of the carrots offered or sticks brandished by those listening only to the voices of a select few individuals and organizations that are interested first with themselves and not wholly with Fijians.
Sometimes there is no way to find out why, but often just thinking about it can move your research along.
Along the way they have pissed off a lot of people. Did the strident, arduous protests have to happen? Maybe. I won't deny that it could be that change would not have come without it, without the pushing and shoving or demands for attention.
Will I donate money to children in certain parts of Africa? Yes.
iti matvā bhajante māṁ
With discipline and independence along with imagination and ambition, no one can stop the spirit of the American worker. Rare is the person lucky enough to have a job provided for them regardless how the economy is doing, so we who do not have that potential then must try harder to show others that, “Yes We Can,” regardless of how good or bad the economy is when we do get out. Don’t deny yourself your own success on your own terms, regardless how high or low you set the bar. It still is and always will be up to you to prove it to yourself before you prove it to anyone else that you are willing to go that extra mile to make the sacrifices often involved to get started towards reaching your own goals of success. Make every day count since there are so few of them. Good Luck and Good Reality!
Floors washed, paperwork done, holes drilled and pictures hung. Even washing machine plumbing, long standing left, is ticked off the list.
This rant is now officially done. For now.
Hi! My name is Gabrielle Feria, creator of The Cake Designer. I am a 13-year-old blogger who loves to bake and write about desserts and breads. I first started baking when I was 8. That was when I was helping my Mom bake cookies.
Ale yeast
Touch Me, I'm Sick
Fish Tank's trailer:
These remarks have negative implications for the NASW and other organizations of social workers. If such organizations pursue an agenda of maximizing their membership, and hence their power and resources — as one would expect a rational, survival-oriented organization to do — then they will be susceptible of corruption, to the extent that they prove willing to endorse every version of social work that marches in the door. Without developing the thought further at the moment, one can expect that there is the profession of social work, with its do-gooder orientation (whether defined in lofty or realistic terms), and then there is the NASW; the interests of the two are not the same; and granting the NASW carte blanche to speak on behalf of the profession as a whole is potentially detrimental to those whom we claim to serve.
On Friday Francis and I celebrated our 22nd wedding anniversary. A very quiet affair these days. No cash, no child sitters and J see to that! But I’m not grumbling, really I’m not. To us an anniversary is about more than two individuals it’s about the wonderful family we have because of our marriage and that means we include the boys in anything we do.
hugs 'n smiles,
Another Pride book (book 7) will come out in 2012 and I can’t wait! I love these books. The next installment is going to be about Crush and Cella. Crush, the tough bear cop who we saw working with Dez McDermot in Beast Behaving Badly, to help rescue Blayne. Cella who joined forces with Dez McDermot and Dee Ann Smith in Big Bad Beast to assist in bringing down the hybrid fighting rings. Two complex and fascinating secondary characters in one book, woooohooooooo!
from an adoption forum
I chose to pipe the frosting - but it was not easy with the coconut in the frosting. It was difficult to get the frosting to exit the tip smoothly from start to finish. I couldn't get the center point to release because the coconut was stringy in the tip...and I was quite off kilter in my piping as I struggled for even coverage. If I do this again, I'd probably just frost them with an offset spatula.
"Phillip Marlowe? What a nice name."
Jenna wrote:
Fade Skinny: Action Learning Sets (ALS) involved regular action-focused peer-discussion groups that address workplace issues. This article reviews the literature and personal experience of ALS and finds that ALS builds trust, helps professional development and enables action on issues/ problems.
I mentioned a couple of days ago that sometimes all we can manage are tiny steps when the big ones are just too much. Afterwards I found myself thinking about some of my earliest memories and wrote a little Adventure you can find next door. It's not much of a story but does seem to indicate certain tendencies that would develop later. If I'm going to add to the memoirs I figured I may as well start over near the beginning.
Bore for men the Word eternal.
“Neither paper currency nor deposits have value as commodities, intrinsically; a ‘dollar’ bill is just a piece of paper. Deposits are merely book entries.” – Modern Money Mechanics Workbook, Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago, 1975
Yesterday you did wonderful things like letting a friend cry on your shoulder, sending a note, walking through someone creative discovery, praying.
" (...) both policy issues and effective responses must be defined at a global level; to influence the solution a global coordination and ‘enlightened leadership’ is required.” and “policy issues, not always solutions, will be defined at a global level. Those few countries or regional blocks like the EU where these technologies are already at an advanced stage may take a more or less enlightened lead role.”
Preheat the oven to 400°. In a food processor, (or with your skillet/smasher) pulse the pretzels until coarsely ground; you should have coarse chunks and fine crumbs. Transfer to a large, shallow bowl.
"Cuban mothers let me assure you that I will solve all Cuba's problems without spilling a drop of blood." Upon entering Havana on January 7, 1959, Cuba's new leader Fidel Castro broadcast that promise into a phalanx of microphones. As the jubilant crowd erupted with joy, Castro continued. “Cuban mothers let me assure you that because of me you will never have to cry."
Why this somewhat curmudgeonly stance? Just that last time I wrote about these, they were not particularly in the spirit of special brews for seasonal purposes, but ordinary beers with a daft name.
“It’s all but a lie”
Alternatively, there may be a time lag between air temperature and stream temperature, they say.
Then if you want to preserve your butter you can follow traditional preserving methods and can it for a later date. I like canning the butter in pint-sized jars so that they are easy to get the butter out with a small knife or spoon. Perfect.
I'm originally from Minnesota. I grew up in the Twin Cities, and attended the University of Minnesota for both college and grad school. But then the lure of gainful employment lured me to New Mexico. A few years later, after a long sequence of events where I was at just the right place at just the right time, I fell in with an amazing collection of professional science fiction writers. I'm still somewhat amazed that they took me in.
But no. Here I was in leggings, a belted shirt, my fancy uggs and a pink coat, following my son around as he ran through the grass, picked up sticks and explored. It was completely unexpected, and I loved it. I got down and dirty with him as I stepped in muddy puddles, got dirt on my butt and slid down the slide into water.
Executive Law § 807, regarding Local land use programs, uses "adoption" as similar to "enactment," rather than filing:
I still think "The Dark Knight Rises" will break the opening weekend record....anyone else agree?
DeSandro, starved as he is of human contact, nevertheless finds no pleasure in these encounters.
Reading this book is moving into a world where the unusual becomes the everyday, and it reels us all in to become part of the magic.
We just need to concentrate, keep calm, keep everyone on the pitch, hope Brad Jones is OK and, above all, stick the bleeding ball in the net when we get the chance! Hope springs eternal so I’ll say 2-1 to us.
Lynda - Hookin' with Laa Laa
Is it too much yoga? Is it possible to be so relaxed, you can watch your life disappear into your navel?
This morning was nuts! Laiken had a softball tournament and had to be at the ballfield at 8:30 and I had to get all the kids ready and out the door and shower myself. And I don't go without makeup. Or a shower. I live 30 minutes away and woke up at 7. I had to rush rush rush. I dropped SB off at my moms because it was cold this morning. Somehow we all made it. I wouldn't trade the craziness for anything though!!
Yeshua and the order of the robes
FUN SCHOOL – We had another great week of fun school studies. Granted, some of it got pushed to this weekend, but we were still able to get it completed.
I guess there really aren't any Easter Carols. But, there are a few songs that go along with the Easter season.
“I still have a job!” you think. Relief floods your mind. “That sounds like something I can handle,” you answer. “I’m all salivated up and ready to go. When can I start?”
“Ah,” he said and took a reluctant seat. I tried to find some safe, pleasant topic to occupy us as we waited for the other three, a challenge given that these were the two people with the very least in common and the most obvious discomfort with one another. Another fifteen minutes passed. Michael, it seemed, was not going to make it after all. I hoped that he was alright.
One of my favorite types of short story is the the microfiction or flash fiction style of short story. Although varying in length, these tales are told in extremely limited word counts -- often under 500 words. And unlike a picture book manuscript of a similar length, these stories are published unillustrated forcing the author to rely solely on words. Some good examples of children's microfiction include Aesop's Fables and some of the shorter fairy tales.
MARCH: Attractive personality. Sexy. Affectionate. Shy and reserved. Secretive. Naturally honest, generous and sympathetic. Loves peace and serenity. Sensitive to others. Loves to serve others. Easily angered. Trustworthy. Appreciative and returns kindness. Observant and assesses others. Revengeful. Loves to dream and fantasize. Loves traveling. Loves attention. Hasty decisions in choosing partners. Loves home decors. Musically talented. Loves special things. Moody.
I love what I do - that is when I'm totally free to do what I do best. If you do something from your heart, then how can it be called work? I've met a few people who do what they love and love what they do - none of them check their watches for tea breaks or the famous 'end of the day' time. They are also not concerned with weekends or holidays - if you do what you love, then everyday is a holiday.
I was privileged to be introduced to, and speak with you Bridget at the Australian College of Midwives Conference on Thursday October 20th 2011 in Sydney. I was in the right place at the right time in midwifery history.
However, my heart cheers despite the terror as we gun it down the hill, over the river, up the opposite side. And, if we hadn't let ourselves go, we would have never discovered the beauty of a winter river, a hidden jewel buried deep in the forest. Nor the exhilaration of facing the challenge together.
2 Tbsp all purpose flour
one of the things most commonly shared by grown unschoolers: a desire to continue unschooling throughout life, in spirit at the very least, whether or not they decide that school will be a part of their lives. I'm not sure all of us succeed in this: the pull to conform, as we've already established, is strong. But, the desire to live the dream is there: the knowledge that, however difficult they are, other ways of living are
Yesterday I went out and bought a new package of prenatal vitamins. 100 tablets in a pack.
It’s easy for communications and advocacy to take a back seat to the many other things that we need to get done on a day-to-day basis. After all, investment of time and effort in this area doesn’t always produce immediate and recognizable benefits. Literacy programs have always been under resourced and the downturn in the economy has made matters even worse. Moreover, demand for services is still high with over 70% of Florida’s community-based literacy organizations reporting that they have waiting lists for instruction.
For instance, as part of a common sense beginners guide to investing, I would have to tell you to never invest more money than you can afford to lose. A beginners guide to investing advice should be, if you really cannot afford to invest, don’t. If you want to invest and are afraid of taking risks, look into money market investing. Money market investing can be done through individual accounts or as part of a pool in a money market mutual fund. Money market investing yields the lowest return, but it represents the safest investments.
grant us peace.
I beginning to think that I should be a bit more adventurous every so often. Anyway, I'm not stressing over it, I suppose that after nearly 10 years of making cards I would have my own 'style', wouldn't I. But I will make a note to self - try something new every now and again!!!
i’m falling asleep.
AKB48 sub-unit Not Yet to release new single “Suika BABY” C-ute – “Kimi wa Jitensha Watashi wa Densha de Kitaku” Event V Cover & Tracklist Released S/mileage Music V Collection 2 DVD Tracklist Released Tanaka Reina – “Kira☆Kira” Making Of DVD Digest Released Buono! In Paris “C’est bon!” PB Cover Released Cover for one of upcoming Niigaki Risa’s stage play released AKB48’s Takahashi Minami cuts her hair due to fire accident Tiffany thought Girls’ Generation would last for only 5 years
Showers washed
In an earlier case we had occasion to state that the decisive point is the date of promulgation of judgment. In that case a judge rendered his decision on January 14; qualified himself as Secretary of Finance on January 16; and his decision was promulgated on January 17. We held that the decision was void because at the time of its promulgation the judge who prepared it was no longer a judge. (Lino Luna vs. Rodriquez, 37 Phil., 186.)
However, we’re also bearing in mind that Utusan on Sunday carries its weekly dose of race poison in the editorial voice Awang Selamat and Chinese-basher extraordinaire Mohd Ridhuan Tee bin Abdullah.
Unfortunately we forgot to bring the camera with us so I don't have any photos to show you. Sadly, the weather is back to nasty with no signs of getting nice again but it was great to get out for a bit yesterday...can you tell we probably needed it???
Other artists may disagree with me on each of these areas. (My own mom insists on only the best!) Of course she is right if you have the means, but I am coming from the standpoint of economy and the ability to make lovely paintings, within budget, with many children. If you can buy the good stuff, buy it. It will be worth it. I feel that starting small is fine. If your children advance or show delight in it, invest in better stuff.
150. Ulysses: James Joyce
Ontario.
Who is looking out for the older sibling’s welfare? Who is going to nurture and love them? Make sure they are educated? Potty train them? Get them dressed and off to school? Do they even go to school?
Parents of murdered British students criticise Barack Obama
I was also impressed to see the escalator shut down automatically. Like it has a sensor or something for things like that. A shoestring isn't even that big of a thing, so it was good to see that the escalator has such a sensitive "off" button in it.
This band, consisting of Scott (lead vocals and guitar), Staz (piano and vocals) and Luke (beatboxing and vocals) gave an enthusiastic performance which was very well-received by the audience. Their beatboxing which featured in the backing track, and their indie-style fashion sense, made them different to the average boy band. Their song “Light Up The Sky” can be seen on their Youtube channel here.
I picked these flat up in Aussie at Rubi shoes, only $10 and super comfy! I also purchased a watch check it oooooooooouuuuuuuuuuuuut. Ive been wanting a nice chunky watch for awhile now and I finally found one I like....must get some close up pictures for you fellas.
13. I toyed with the idea of using a pattern or a light purple silk for the window panels but ultimately decided I liked the color better on the walls. These airy smocked drapes from Pottery Barn are in keeping with the feminine room.
Now, on to the crafty business! Last week I whipped up a thank you card for my mom. She had worked on Abie's costume for the play and it was really fantastic! I thought it was the best costume there, personally. I need to post a pic of it, but it's on a different camera. Maybe later this week? Anyway, here's the card I made...
I get my kicks from hitting the high notes, you know what I mean?"
For the next three days I'll also be premiering some new products by Coffee Break Designs as well. For those of you unfamiliar with the company they make stencils, shrine and book kits as well as carry some other unusual mixed-media stuff.
I am loving this reset. I’m not craving anything or whining because I cannot have something. It has me thinking alot about food and how I and others view it. The obesity in this country is just getting out of control and we need to do something about it! If you think you’re hungry, find something else to do and wait another 15-20 minutes. If you’re still hungry then find something nutritious to snack on. If that doesn’t sound good then you’re just not hungry. You are probably thirsty, so go and drink some water.
- Alan, Huddersfield, 10/3/2012 19:42
Well the first thing I’m thinking of has to do with how yard work relates to the gardening tool, a spade. And YIKE, 9 relates (via numerology) to a transition, death, ending, permanent change. Spades are used for digging in the garden. Well, I pick up my card and look at what I wrote on the 9 of spades card itself. On the card I wrote, “warning, papers, accidents”. Does this mean that I had a warning and did not heed it and thus had an accident? Gosh, I do remember it hurting like blazes at first, nearly like a muscle pull. On the hand out paper it says, “Bad luck in all things, depression and low energy, destruction, deaths, extreme anxiety.” Well, that’s pretty negative! Isn’t it? I don’t think that I need to go much further; after all, I already know the past. I’m going to go with “a bad luck accident” in my interpretation. I may look at the tarot suit of swords as a comparison. The 9 of Swords in tarot is about worrying too much—that’s one interpretation that I’d give it. One insight I’d give here to myself here is that my worry about the elbow (I did fret about it quite a lot because it has been limiting—hurting with nearly every moVement) may have prolonged my suffering. Too much fretting kept the pain going perhaps. Okay, let’s look at the present.
Here is a little story that lives in my head.
Time for the second Mythic Interview Friday--and you're in for another treat. It's strange to think that I first met Mary Hoffman nearly 30 years ago when I was the young and enthusiastic editor of the first Yellow Banana Books. I worked on Beware, Princess which she wrote for the series (and which, if I recall correctly, was the first book illustrated by one Chris Riddell, then fresh out of art college). In those days, I trembled in the face of Mary's towering reputation as author, critic and journalist (I still do), but we have got to know each other well over the years, and I am proud to call her my friend. Mary's Stravaganza sequence has become one of my 'must-read' recommendations for any teenager who likes a fabulous mix of adventure, romance and magic. I recently read the latest--City of Ships--which came out in March 2010 and is just as wonderful as its predecessors. If you haven't come across these books yet, go and buy them at once! Now, enough from me--here are Mary's answers to my seven mythically-minded questions. I love how different they are from Caroline Lawrence's set last Friday. That's what this interviewing business is all about.
I hang up the phone and laugh. I almost lost an audition in front of the casting director for a hit TV show because I didn’t have a cello, even though production would be providing one for the shoot? In what world does that make sense?
Been doubted a lot along the way so with each line the harder I try.
Says the bloke in black.
Oh yeah, "O.O.L.P.", Operation One Less Present...... HO! HO! HO!
Racked: 04-04-2008
Though a history that lengthy is worthy of note alone, the stone’s infamy is multiplied by the curse it allegedly carries. The curse has its origins in an old Hindu text, and reads like so:
They also have one from The Times also in 1954 gives further evidence that as far back as that we were being cleansed from our communities. There were 200 a month arriving without work or accommodation and was causing concern in London, Liverpool and Birmingham.
I hope that the Lib Dems will increase their numbers on the London assembly, but again polls suggest otherwise and there’s no point in sticking our heads in the sand about it. Failure to improve on our current three AM’s will mean the party once again will have an all-white team in the London Assembly, as we have had since City Hall was created in 2000.
She describes routine and unusual events of her life during the war concisely and without emotion or self-pity. Once I became used to her style of writing I found the book a fascinating insight into the life of an ordinary, yet, in many ways extraordinary, young Londoner during the war. I would recommend it to anyone who is interested in civilian life at that time.
How can you participate?
Even in California where Proposition 8 passed 52 percent to 48 percent, a gay rights measure was struck down by the courts and currently is making its way through the appeals process. In 2006 Arizona similarly passed a gay marriage measure by a slim 51 percent but voted two years later to ban it.
Here are the top benefits I've found to journaling:
Online links
It's been a couple of years since I gave up
Dear Free-Range Kids: On Saturday afternoon, the neighbor kids rang the bell and off ran our almost 8-year-old daughter to wander the block, chalking sidewalks and digging worms. Then we stood in the kitchen and talked about Etan Patz. The unthinkable happened, for that family lightening did strike and as parents we can’t imagine their pain.
We are almost in the water...
i was born in california,
He has made it to the winner’s circle. Not because he’s getting married, but he found the right person and he actively works on making her happy. In turn, she does the same for him. When he made his mind up, he was ready.
“Tell them dear, that if eyes were made for seeing,
We made a bunch of phone calls, and left her in the hands of the apartment management. Again, that was all last week.
Swagbucks.com is an online portal dedicated to helping you earn digital dollars called "Swag Bucks", which can be redeemed for exclusive Swagbucks.com merchandise. Visit their "How it Works" page to learn more about:
the brainchild of a deranged manic-depressive with limitless capital.
This is how you improve on shrimp cocktail. Roast the shrimp, don't boil and prepare a good spicy cocktail dipping sauce.
Make no bones about it. This is all out class warfare and we the people are under attack. We cannot let these crooks think tyranny is business as usual. Let’s take the fight to the enemy!
The situation quickly became really wack.
So the lesson here is the AL continues to be the premier league in MLB as the money spent in that league continues to dwarf every NL team not named the Phillies.
The ethics committee wraps its investigations in a thick cloud of secrecy. It literally takes an act of Congress to get the committee to publicly reveal the details of the case it makes against one of its own. That's the case again with Waters. The committee completed its investigation, and published its eyes only report on Waters in August 2009.
And never even want to know
2010.07.26 Pakistan Darra Adamkhel 5 0 Three children are killed when Islamic terrorists fire a rocket into a family home.
If you have an opportunity to expose personally your business plan to an investor, you must take a printed summary as well as a PowerPoint presentation.
3t dressing, recipe follows
… what every tutor needs to know…
How certain girls would choose dare
"That's terrible!""Who'd look good in that??""Where would anybody actually WEAR that?" "WHO would actually buy that??"
Accelerated nursing programs is for those who have always wanted to be a nurse to serve other people in their community but do not have the time to be enrolled in a traditional college and be hooked in the university for a number of years. There is a rise in need of competent nurses in our country these days and this is one reason why people should consider their options in career change. Many people have come to realized that serving their fellowmen is one calling that needs to be addressed.
2-Kids love to climb. The higher, the better! Fear is not in their definition.
“Yoshioka Futaba has a few reasons why she wants to “reset” her image & life as a new high school student. Because she’s cute, she was ostracized by her female friends in junior high, and because of a misunderstanding, she couldn’t get her feeling across to the one boy she has ever liked, Tanaka-kun.
“Look,“ said Ty, “I’m not going to sit here and debate and argue whether Malcolm X hated or didn’t hate white people. All I’m saying is, literary works with the word “nigger” in it, used in a derogatory way, by a white guy, who would have no problem calling a black guy a nigger in real life, should not be listed as a classic. It degrades our heritage and this country.”
I hunt because it is a lifestyle - and it's my lifestyle. It's dreaming of being out on a hunt when stuck in the office. It's knowing that right now it's midnight, I just got my kid to sleep but it's ok because in 5 hours my alarm is going off and I am going hunting. It's knowing that when you're out there in the woods, in your blind, or in your tree stand all your worries are gone and that is a feeling that no substance can duplicate.
I firmly believe that collecting one’s thoughts and representing problem structure in some graphical form aids learning and communication. Simply representing thoughts as slabs of text can be inefficient and hide errors. There is academic research to demonstrate this. Most of us have tried to capture our thoughts with a pen-and-paper mind map. But problems soon expand beyond the page and editing them can be difficult. Luckily there are some very nice software packages that solve some of these problems.
My wonderful Manly will be able to fix my sweet little 1993/212,000 mile car, but in the meantime I am slightly home bound.
I wanted to have homemade cheesecake for my party. I just LOVE cheesecake. We found a recipe on the Philidelphia Cream Cheese, and got the stuff we needed. I've never made real homemade cheesecake before, so I'm hoping it turns out ok. Kinda weird, but it wanted me to make it in a 9x13 pan. I've only seen cheesecake made in a pie pan. I'll let you know how it turns out :)
Chantal xoxo
On May 14th, we will begin our next Paleo Challenge – opening it up to CrossFit Assault Members AND non-CrossFit Assault members! Great prizes to be won – thanks Mike!
Premiere of South Austin Brewing Live Music series
Or had been.
I know, 15 is a weird number. In any case here they go:
Pellizzetti says grass-fed beef has saturated fat levels as low as chicken. He says it is also high in Omega 3 fatty acids (the “good” kind), while typical industrial beef has no Omega 3 and lots of “bad” Omega 6 fatty acid.
With my project, presentation has been an issue for me, whether to present my pictures separately, as triptychs, in a book etc, has been an extremely difficult decision for me to make. I think it comes down to what you are trying to say, but also how you think it looks best. You can’t just worry about one or you lose the other, you have to think about both the message and aesthetic presentation in order to get the most out of the final presentation of your images.
Well....that's it for me today. I have Mount Ironing to climb....3 weeks of catching up to do. Then I'm off to stamp one of my Maggie's and enter TOMIC challenge, which I haven't done for a while.
The Argentina international looked destined to leave City in January after his self-imposed exile following his infamous spat with boss Roberto Mancini in Munich.
»Scene 5: iCarly studio«
If they would only use all of themselves to see and not just their eyes
Anyhoo, I'm about to make a fresh cup of coffee and get a "sliver" (snort) of the last cake, which our family sampled this morning for breakfast. It was delicious!
Preheat oven to 190°C/375°F; line twelve 1/3 cup (80ml) capacity muffin pans with paper liners.
I shake hands with my friend,
Please I must amend
“Music? Seriously Secretary Penfold? What exactly can this music do? I listen to music everyday, but we don’t raise the country’s alert status every time I turn on my stereo.”
you do decide to smoke, can you at least smoke a cigarette that smells moderately OK? Stop smoking something that smells like you're burning a 50-50 mixture of dried horse dung and dead cockroaches.
The most important thing to improve the quality and ease of making them into a quilt is to stabilize each tshirt. Non woven lightweight interfacing or my favorite woven interfacing for knits. These can be found at most fabric stores and on the internet–ebay is also a good choice.
Hey! That's where I live! It's also a song from one of my Top Ten Concept Albums of all-time (yours, too, I'll bet.)
Our building's yearly Julebord is a joint effort, coordinated by the building committee and joined in by the whole residency. We all sign up for something to bring and gather at one person's flat for pre-drinks and another for the dinner. So we had martinis at this one woman's flat (gin! Ack! I haven't had gin since 1989...it hurt me badly) as an apertif and hung out there for an hour, then up to the other flat (our neighbors across the way) for the dinner.
We owe it to the victims and their survivors to ascertain and tell the truth about their deaths-to identify who killed them, to know why they were stabbed or shot or blasted by explosives or set on fire.
"Oh, my God, this is awesome!"
Science can answer the seemingly intractable question of how the universe came into being, and there is reason to believe that science will eventually be able to explain the origins of consciousness too. Science is an ever-advancing process, and the end is not in sight. If at some future date we are able to explain the mind in terms of the activity of a universe of neurons, if all our mental processes do prove to have their source in the flow of charged ions within nerve cells, that would not mean that science denies the worth of “love, trust, faith, beauty, awe, wonder, compassion, truth, the arts, morality, and the mind itself.” To explain something is not to diminish or deny its worth. It is also important to recognize that even if we consider a scientific explanation of our thought processes (or anything else) aesthetically or spiritually unsatisfying or unpalatable, that does not make it false. Our explanations must be guided by truth; truth cannot be adjusted to conform to what we want to hear.
Gotta problem? Ask Betty, and then fuck off!
What an amazing adventure! And the bonus? We've all been invited back for next year at the same time. If you can swing it, definitely make the trip. It was truly one of the nicest retreats I've participated in. Just sign up on the website to receive updates for 2011.
Customer reviews & ratings of Houzer A2522-65BS4-1 Glowtone 25-by-22-Inch ADA Compliant Single Bowl Drop-In Stainless Steel Sink with Four Faucet Holes are available in the merchant’s site, check it by visit the link below.
Kim owns Left Bank Books in Manhattan a store for rare first-editions, not a business you can establish just anywhere, so he obviously knows writing and knows publishing. He's also THE expert on Don Barthelme, the influential Houston writer, and has edited a couple of books of his work.
I've underlined sentences in books (sometimes too fervently) and made odd notes in the margins and between the lines. Oddly enough, I never seem to manage to put pen/pencil to page when there is a genuine typing error in the text. I always catch these mistakes - even in second or third editions of books - and never bother correct them in my own edition, let alone contemplate contacting anyone about fixing it for future ones.
Even if it is true as alleged that the opposition instigated the crowd to breach Dataran Merdeka, was the level of violence perpetrated by the police justified? Witnesses talked of exit routes being blocked off. Why did the police kettle the people and stop them from going home? Why make them angry and frustrated?
Taught to walk a rut that is
Today, however, I am all alone and only seeking my own approval. I thought that French Toast with Roasted Asparagus and Orange Butter Sauce would be delicious. I adapted a recipe torn from Martha Stewart Living to use ingredients that I had on hand and was sure that *I* (not Hubs) would enjoy. It was divine and would be a perfect breakfast or brunch for guests, but I can assure you that you don't have to save this enticing meal for guests. Go ahead. Whip it up. You don't need anyone's approval.
Daido Moriyama (1 gelatin silver print and 1 book, 1967, 1968)
I, on the other hand, would be eating. The entire time. Despite the producers entreaties to stop, I’d be shoving every sophisticated morsel of dragon fruit and brie cheese and herbed focaccia bread in sight into my pie hole.
Nor do I believe that fascism is the culprit. No, I think that the rise in surveillance and the loss of privacy are the natural results of both the control freak propensities of the power elite, and the boohoo whinging of the carebears. People have been taught to expect someone to hold their hands, when they don’t get it, they are outraged – just as they are IRL when the cops do nothing. That makes the carebears call out for someone to do something, and the power elite is all too happy to oblige as it directly feeds their need for power and control.
My father was a bit more careful. One favourite image that remains with me is that of him walking through the gates, after a day spent saving hay, a straw hat shielding him from more freckles.
I’ve had a husband.
This embrace is my earliest memory. And as I make my way around the world, I am always homeward bound. I don’t want to be uprooted and transplanted to some far off land where I may forget the look in my mother’s eye and that smile when I would try to call out her name but only bubbles would form around the edges of my lips. Every step I take is somehow guided by this memory.
I'm doing it again. Aren't I?
by RealityTrader
Sorry for the confusion!
2 T. yellow mustard
My Mom recently just purchased a home by me to be by us. It is not a full time home yet but will be soon. One day when I was over her house she gave me this tea and I just fell in love with it. Of course now that I love it, it is very hard to find. Not many people by us carry it. Whenever we are together we have a nice hot cup of tea and spend some time together. Usually playing our games together or talking. We have a store by us called BB's which is an Amish "bent and dent" store. OMG I love, love, love this store. It is filled with bargains. You do have to watch because things are close to be expiring or are expired but not everything. Well much to my complete shock they had a box of our tea for $1!!! I was thrilled. The box was a bit beat up but I didn't care since the bags inside are individually wrapped. If you are wondering, the tea is VANILLA CARAMEL by Bigelow.
The Allen Group Real Estate
Finally, is Samuel Amoah, who, even though he's wearing a belt, has his trousers at half mast - all the better to show off his Calvin Klein boxer shorts. Yes, he's another poseur! In his right hand is a Coca-Cola bottle and in his left, a 9mm Micro-Uzi Machine Pistol. He's wearing a black beanie hat. Check out his gold ear-rings and bracelets, as he also shows off his "bling."
Sometime I don't know what to do other than love someone. A dear friend lost his mom two years ago today. I'm watching him like a movie: his pain, his isolation. I can feel sad for him;I am both removed and completely a part of the situation.
This is my library copy of the book after I finished reading it. There are no less than 80 tiny yellow stickies to mark my interest:
In addition to the story, the characters were wonderful. Juno was such a different heroine and it was interesting to see how much she grew (literally) throughout the novel. The novel starts with Juno at age 11 and ends with Juno aged 14! Now this sounds a little strange but considering it was a 350 page novel with 3 birthdays squeezed in, the pacing was ideal for this novel. The birthdays didn’t feel rushed or jammed together and neither did anything else, it all flowed together pretty nicely!
So after swirling in this for a few days, I turned to Ecclesiastes, my solace. In it King Solomon describes nearly everything as useless, and “a chasing after wind”. He says we have a hunger which will never be quenched; we seek to acquire wealth, of which there will never be enough; we seek wisdom which only causes more and more vexation; it is a great and heavy burden God has placed on man, therefore the only thing we can do is enjoy our toil. The fruits of our toil can never be enjoyed, because there will never be an end to acquiring them, and then some day we will die-turning to dust just like the animals. So we must enjoy our work, our food, our drink-enjoy the lot which God has given us. We are but dust, but God is God.
The second (you can read it in full here), about two guys determined to stay high during a family weekend at Disneyland, belongs here as another outstanding example of the way Sullivan becomes one with whatever he writes about.
My friend Will showed me around the city that night. We walked around Soho, East Village, and Greenwich Village. I love this place already!
As my title states, it is an admirable attempt. If I had to make a comparison it is a mesh of David Fincher’s Seven meets Guy Ritchie’s Sherlock Holmes. The way the mystery killer rationalizes who he kills and how based on Poe’s stories is like how Seven’s mystery man killed people based on the seven deadly sins. Then the costume and dialogue is similar to the old fashion banter of Sherlock Holmes. The best scene of the whole movie was the costume ball held at the Hamilton’s mansion. The costumes were so well done and it is a pivotal moment of the story.
fois gras and champagne jelly on toasted Poilane bread
He talks about everything from "telling political correctness to take a hike because this is what we believe in," to his discussion with the head of the ACLU about standing up for the rights of unborn babies, to his thoughts on different medical issues and the extent of government involvement and a national health care plan.
I mean, I know I sent a text saying I wanted to have sex with him and was somewhat persistant about hanging out (but I don’t think annoyingly persistant), so maybe that was too soon, but if he really liked me, I don’t think that would really matter. So I just don’t know. But honestly, I’m already tired of the disappointment of dating again and it’s exhausting and taking a toll on me.
Light Square Gallery
The Idiot approached and looked at a tiny little red welt on the woman’s upper chest that would not be easily visible under most cheap microscopes.
He was later interviewed, charged under Sections 5 (1) and (6) of the Public Order Act and released on bail on the condition that he did not preach in public.
Like you wouldn't believe.........
Feels so fine
I learned a lot in my leadership courses, yet a tremendous amount of learning has come from my experiences on the job. I learned most importantly during my school leadership courses that there is no set way to respond to problems. On the job, I learned that I have to adapt, consider a range of options, weigh the pros and cons, seek input and make decisions in situations that may be unexpected. Often this happens on the run – and sometimes I may trip and fall. Regardless of whether the results of a fall are major or minor, there are things I have learned from these setbacks.
Read-Again Ratio: B (3 points)
This week in my neck of the woods
The gangsta second from the right is the uber-cool (in his eyes, anyway!) Adonis Mensah. GURPS Tactical Shooting has a section called "Things Not To Do" and second on the list is "Gangsta Shooting" as demonstrated by Adonis here. GURPS disparagingly remarks, "gangsta shooting has become popular with people who don't know what they're doing but worry about how they look while doing it." Ouch! The problem is gunmen who adopt this stance cannot aim properly. Adonis is clearly a fool. Just look how he's clutching his crotch. Who's he trying to impress? Note that he is wearing a black bandana on his head.
Thanks to everyone for sharing some amazingly crazy plans, hopes and experiences!
Imagine my surprise when it dawned on me that I had been conceived and held in God’s heart long before my parents brought me home.
In this case, prosecutors are charging Anderson and Sayles with attempted capital murder because that crime doesn’t carry a statute of limitations, Wilson said.
Place in a large pot (if the fruit is dry add a little water),
I used two of my favorite Michael Miller fabrics from the collection called "Gypsy Bandana." I've been saving this fabric for a long time because I knew I wanted to make something out of it--I just didn't know what.
83. Take a class at the rec department
On Easter Sunday we hope to go to church and to the Palm Beach Zoo. And next weekend there's an SCA event aaand... THE FAIR!!! I love The Miami-Dade Fair and go every year, so I am really excited about going with my sweetie. But more than anything I am happy to hang out with him after not seeing him for three whole weekends. ♥
The movie does that for you. They choose who to respresent each character and they create the sceneries for the film. Sometimes I am disappoingted when ‘my movie’ does not match the actual movie. This happens most often with the actors that portray the people from the book. I was truly worried about this with the Hunger Games. I think mainly because I had just read the book and also because I had no idea who the stars were. Katniss is such a strong person and the actor portraying her had to be equally strong. They really got it right with Jennifer Lawrence. She was amazing!
Even the most obscure lp's, everything is gone.
8. I must sleep all the time, see number 10.
I arrived in February 1948. Dad went to the local priest and pointed out that, at this rate, he’d have a football team by 1959. The priest suggested he should trust in God, a recommendation that flew in the face of events to date. Instead, my father began taking the hairdresser up on his “Anything for the weekend?” offer. It was the end of a Catholicism that had been massively important to him. Even today, I admire the decision as that of a rational man who loved a heathen, and refused to be cowed by a dominant influence. There is a lesson in that for all of us today.
Existence depends
Here’s the box of the Beena Lite (hmm… XD) being bundled with the new Best Wishes game:
I'm thankful that we were able to have such plenty on our table this Thanksgiving, all healthy food made from scratch with love.
Simon and Donna Beckmann (Founders of Joya: arte + ecología. Spain)
The following poem is my attempt to put into words what I experienced that day.
Superstar snitch Larry Fairfax began his testimony today. Fairfax alleges that Edgar Steele wanted Cyndi hit because he thought she was having an affair and because he wanted to take up with a younger woman; he allegedly feared the costs of a divorce from Cyndi. Fairfax told jurors that although he accepted money from Steele, he never intended to kill anyone and told the FBI about the plot because he feared retribution. He also admitted in open court that he thought there might be a way he could get the money without actually performing the hit on Cyndi. Fairfax also testified that when Steele started pressing him on the delay, and threatened to find someone else who would take care of his wife, and Fairfax, too, he contacted lawyer Jim Michaud, and the two arranged a meeting with federal authorities. The FBI gave Fairfax a recording device, and he secretly taped two conversations with Steele at his Talache Road home, east of Sagle near Shepherd Lake.
Return to where you belong,
Such honest and forthright statements of intent go over the heads of the leftist politicians though. Former Labour Minister Tony Benn recently said:
Three years later, a devastated Madge escapes war-torn London with her two children for a dilapidated house in Dorset. She is crippled with grief at the news her husband has been lost over the channel, but determined to give Lily and Cyril the best Christmas ever.
Michael Hardy Edwards, 33, New York, N.Y.
After a week of Lagers in beaut Chiang Mai I was craving a good 'ol ale! Had a stein of the Dunkel to start off nice roasty choc malt on the nose and a faint noble hop aroma. Wow... on the mouth full it was very malty and caramelly in taste and smooth as! It was more like a robust porter beer than a German style Dunkle. The Weizen was very nice too! Big banana and clove notes on the nose true to style, very cold creamy and refreshing going down as a good Weizen should be! It filled me up quite quickly though due to the wheat malts and having close to a litre of Dunkle before! Now the Lager....Now this was a big surprise! No big hop aroma but a subtle scent of a noble hop was there along with a good fresh somewhat pilsner malt grain tone. Mmmmm....nice and cold going down like a Lager should be with a awesome very well balanced bitter after taste! Easily the best lager I had on my Malaysia/Thailand trip! I can see why this was the most favored brew at the venue! Could of drank it all night...and almost did!
One of the most common concerns about the prevalence of GMOs (genetically modified organisms) in North America is whether they are safe for our children and families to be eating.
But the Democratic-controlled Senate may resist the bill on the grounds that it puts NSA in charge of information sharing and not the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), a civilian cybersecurity center. The cybersecurity threat environment is serious enough to warrant a set of regulations that would require the setting of cybersecurity standards, argued the four sponsors of the Cybersecurity Act (S. 2105) — Sens. Joe Lieberman (I-Conn.), Susan Collins (R-Maine), Jay Rockefeller (D-WV) and Dianne Feinstein (D-Calif.).
But most of all,
My first book idea was a novel set in the world of magazines. But then Bridget Jones came out. And (much later) The Devil Wears Prada. I couldn't compete, nor did I want to. So I shelved it. And decided to write about something I really knew: London and Paris. Over 3 months I wrote an outline of a memoir. I pitched it to Kay Scarlett at Murdoch Books. Amazingly, she accepted. It sold out in the first 3 weeks. No one was more surprised than I was. But it just showed: Write what you know.
The failures speak for themselves. I'm not a household name, my books are not bestsellers and I'm not a millionaire... though I'm not sure whether I was aiming at those things, and I certainly wasn't expecting them. What I have achieved is three published books, several more completed ones which have not yet found homes, and an exciting new project for younger readers recently commissioned (and still under wraps). But, much more importantly, I've learned quite a bit, made some wonderful new friends and had a lot of fun.
Hello friends! It's been rather cold and drab weather here lately. Not very spring-like, and very windy too.
Thanks Lorraine for entering this fabulous project into our challenge. :)
But to get to the point of this story; the Kolsch is all gone. We heard that the Laurelwood pub on Sandy is out too. Instead we got their new seasonal, an alt they call Sticke Altbier. It's dark red, roasted tasting, hardy, and bitter. It's great.
Thanks again, everyone!! until next time, TAKE CARE AND GOD BLESS!!!
“We said we'd be there by 8.”
I'll leave you with a pretty picture so you aren't too traumatized for visiting my blog today:
Les Enfants du Paradis by World’s End Girlfriend
Do not cut, turn and work on row ends, sc in ea row end and sc around, sc dec on inner corners, do NOT increase on outer corners.
Scott: Social media is great for facilitating mob mentality. A fan on their own might be disappointed with the game’s ending, but through social media they can find a large anonymous community to fuel and escalate those views. Someone filed a complaint with the FTC over Mass Effect 3′s ending. I can’t see that happening without a large enough social media community to reinforce the idea so that an individual thinks that is an appropriate course of action.
“Bottom” -Tool
Rep. Pete Stark (D-CA): I wish I had big enough expense allowance to get one of those new “S’s” that Solyndra’s going to make down there, the electric car. My 10 year old is after me. He no longer wants a Porsche. He wants dad to have an “S” sedan. They sound wild. I guess they run $60,000-$90,000.”
2 1/2 teaspoons salt
associated with the use of organic makeup before investing.
The space at 942 W Lake only. The other is closed. 942 is called Packer Schopf gallery.
Jill is a talented artist who has shown that she can create art in any media she works with. Her positive spirit is infectious and is reflected in her mixed media work that is full of joy, passion, energy and color. Her more serious side can be seen in her representational works of portraits and both urban and natural landscapes. We collaborated together, along with 4 other artists (Supria Karmakar, Veronica Funk, Rita Vindedzis and Roxanne Evans-Stout), on an altered book project called Inner Works. We worked together on a Global Guerilla Knit Project. And more recently, we collaborated on a poetry and art altered book project which you will soon hear more about.
These photographers, who are part of the Delhi based World Photography Partners, have earlier been a part of different successful exhibitions at the Habitat Centre and Alliance Francaise De Delhi. All profits from this exhibition will go to support Sarthak Prayas, an NGO working for Voluntary Blood Donation Promotion, HIV/AIDS, Thallassemia, Children Education and Senior Citizens Welfare (www.sarthakprayas.org)
1 Praise the LORD, all nations! Extol him, all peoples!
Another really long run proceeded, maybe 1.5 miles long where I came to the Mystery Obstacle. I absolutely hated this obstacle, it wasn’t hard, wasn’t physically demanding, wasn’t long, it just pissed me off FAR too much. It was a short pool of muddy water that was maybe 30 yards long and about shin deep but they had taken a backhoe and dug out random holes that were 3 to 5 ft. deep. You couldn’t see them, you couldn’t prepare for them, you just randomly fell into them without warning. It pissed me off. Anyway…
In the hardest of nights
For you Creative Times readers who enjoy learning more about the brilliant minds and hard workers behind the scenes of Sesame Street, here are all the posts in one convenient spot.
me: "Ummm, yeah, no. With my job its kinda frowned upon."
Do you often go into your closet, that’s filled with tons of clothes, some with tags still on, some without tags, some items that have never seen the light of day, and you think, “I’ve got nothing to wear?”
Jen: Well, we’ve got some big changes coming up. First, we’ll be getting five chickens this weekend. Then a family with two little boys will be moving in with us the following weekend. There’s a lot to do to get ready.
This takes place at times in the moon's orbit when it is completely hidden by the earth’s shadow, as cast by the sun.
After four days being away from office (apparently not from my mail), I feel absolutely great. Yeah, I mean absolutely fantastically superbly great!! Alhamdulillah. I could not imagine if I had taken Monday off too. Surely, the excitement would be double or maybe triple. But that’s ok, I’m still happy with my four off days.
They sit on the couch cuddling each other. Yoochun stroke Junsu’s hair softly with one hand while the other hand wrapped protectively on his wife’s waist. Junsu smile at the beautiful moment and hug his husband tighter.
According to the logic in the last piece, if Israel attacked, then Iran – which essentially developed its program in contravention of the Non-Proliferation Treaty it signed, and despite international inspectors – may choose not to let those inspectors back in and, as a result, have an easier time pursuing nuclear weapons.
What I like is the way they we see Houtarou’s thinking process. It’s not the typical flashback with characters thing or just a close-up of his face. The images are moving in the way he’s thinking about all of this. What this anime also does right is that it doesn’t rely on random deux ex machina as much as some other detectives sometimes do. Even before the part with the paint smell I was thinking about the book being used for some kind of class already just by the ways Houtarou pushed us. He doesn’t do some weird tricks, this is pure realistic logic that we could also have solved. Even without the “smell of paint” thing they could have solved it. The smell was just to speed everything up so the case could be wrapped up in ten minutes. Like last episode they did an amazing job in making me interested in the story and giving us a satisfying end.
The main skincare brand I use is Good Things, which I'm sure many of you have heard of. The company was started by beauty journalist and author Alice Hart Davis who has formulated the range especially for young skin. I first bought the Miracle Mattifier moisturiser by accident, I'm not sure what I thought it was but anyway it lead me to the other products so it must have been fate ;) I start every day by cleansing my face with the Stay Clear Purifying cleanser, following the instructions on the tuble. It does recommend using it twice a day, which I do sometimes, but really I'm quite lazy! When my face is dry I then apply the Miracle Mattifier moisturiser in upwards circles on my neck and face. Make sure it's sunk in before you apply make up (this may sound obvious, but apparently not to me!).
You guys, I can't believe I have not told you this story! I had to dig back through my archives to make sure, but nope, I did not tell you about that one time Oscar's school lost him and they kind of fibbed about what happened and then the next day told me the whole truth and apologized profusely.
Oliver has always been in favour of fighting and in that respect he’s very like Shane (they wouldn’t react kindly to that comparison) but he balances out Amelie’s need to protect and retreat. They make a good ruling pair. I hope Amelie gets a magical cure for her fatal Draug bite because Oliver as sole ruler of Morganville would be terrifying.
Silla (53 BC – 935 AD) was a nation of immigrants like Balhae and Singapore too, built by gradual conquest and assimilation of neighboring statelets and tribes but at a much controlled pace than Balhae which explained its political longevity of nearly a thousand years.
I particularly like this dish because it is light, despite the cream and the cheese. I am sure, it has the calories but it does not leave one, bloated. It has a subtle flavor and is enjoyable.
The van took an unexpected detour from the usual route home when it pulled onto a soft slope a dozen feet from a cornfield. The child looked up at her mother across the length of the vehicle, seeing only the top half of her face in the rear-view mirror. Her mother was looking at the field with wide eyes; they followed the gentle sway of the dried, golden stalks in the chill November breeze. The field seemed just a bit out of place, but the child had grown used to her window view of homes, stores, and businesses being interrupted by occasional fields of potatoes, onions, wheat, and corn. Her mother had never stopped next to one before.
The negatives: Cartoon characters are becoming a turnoff for adult consumers, and this is spam’s audience because they are the ones cooking for their families. Just look at all the backlash about recent car insurance ad characters in a recent car insurance commercial. Cartoon characters? Not the best motivator for these consumers.
For this plot typicalness and similarity to many other present day action movies, I had to knock down Ghost Protocol’s rating. Though I enjoyed the action sequences and inventive camera angles, the writers could have been more original.
Kelly Clarkson – Mr. Know it All
"It'll give her something to fight," William said.
And that one Talent which is death to hide,
Meanwhile, we welcome poets who are represented as fresh poets to join our leadership group under their own wish or motivation. We expect our group to grow and expand so that more poets are inspired, more poems are composed and shared, and more joy or fulfillment in poetry is discovered.
Drink out of a water bottle HERSELF
Gone is the magnificent Doctor Heiter (Dieter Laser), replaced with a more realistic and terrifying villain. The actor behind Walter (Laurence R. Harvey) doesn't have a name like Dieter Laser, but he does have a terrifying face and looks (and sounds) like a man I used to work with. Martin works as a security guard in a car park, which is a standard career for this sort of movie psychopath. Clearly a man with problems mental and physical (he's frequently described as 'a midget' and 'a retard'), Martin is obsessed with the film The Human Centipede. Director Tom Six pre-empted the BBFC suggesting idiots could be influenced by the Human Centipede 2 by making a film in which an idiot is obsessed with The Human Centipede. It's quite meta, when you think about it.
2. Primary care physicians need to look to each other. The unwarranted variation in the standard of care between primary care practices is no longer acceptable. GPs, acting in networks across a community, and in collaboration with specialists should strive to bring up the standards of care across their patch. Under-performance should not be tolerated, and clinical leadership, with solid clinical support, is essential to provide the credibility to enforce high clinical standards within a local health community. (This applies to the secondary care community too by the way)
The use of social media websites, emails lists, and lead generation websites are where the future of real estate is going online. Real estate agents are able to learn the secrets of the real estate marketing and are tapping into the huge market of buyers that are in every city and state in the U.S.
Here are our NON-BINDING guidelines...
"It was my early birthday present for someone to be critical of me as a mother, and that was really a defining moment, and I loved it," Mrs. Romney said.
What can audiences expect from Smudge?
Go ahead and guess what has happened? Yep! I’m locked in. At this point I’m laughing so hard I’m crying. 10 minutes later I break out and can now retrieve my shower items. As I go to put the toilet lid down to place towels on it…it ends up on the ground. Silly me to think it was connected TO the toilet. It was then I glanced up and saw handprints on either side of the door…sorta painted on. Maybe I’m not the first to be trapped here.
My classmate just didn’t get it. She wrote, “I guess to each his own, but I do believe that some of the people that would have bought HD’s would go to another company just to get a motorcycle, because sometimes waiting for something can make you lose interest. Look at how many companies are selling motorcycles now. Of course, they do not have the ALLURE of a HD, but if you’ve dreamed of reading a bike through the desert, or some other dream location, and you can’t get it for 2 years, then I think your attitude and circumstances will dictate that you buy something else and get on with your LIFE.”
That knowledge of their quest makes every decision a simple one—not always easy, but simple. It is not my timetable that matters, it's theirs. Any attempt I make to hold them back from what they feel ready for is going to lead to resentment, anger, secrets, and fights. Sometimes what they're ready for isn't comfortable for me. Sometimes it takes tremendous courage for me to set that discomfort aside and trust what they know. But I do it, because it's not about me. It's about them, and it's about saying "yes" to the steps they want to take.
As February comes to an end, another National Heart Month leaves with it. As the recognition for Heart Month fades it is important to remember its lasting effects throughout the rest of the year. According to the World Health Organization, 17.3 million people die every year from cardiovascular disease or related causes.
"Grave circumstances" as named in the aforementioned clause, refers to:
Today I got my notification of Irish PLR. Many writers I know have been saying their PLR payments have been dropping, year on year. (PLR is money from public lending rights, paid on books borrowed from libraries.) Generally, my UK PLR rises, perhaps because I keep writing books at a healthy rate. I'm not sure whether the Irish is up or down, but I thought I'd do a little statistical analysis to see which books earn the most.
3:45
2. Daffy Duck's Rhapsody - Mel Blanc
Hey... at least I never have to worry about being late for work if my alarm clock runs out of batteries.
I do have two more preschool finger print projects to share but those will have to wait until next week.
The garden is also keeping us quite busy this year. At the end of March, the plants were already at the stage of growth they're not normally at until early May. Nice, but it means that the mowing and weeding and general garden care has advanced as well!
Earth-little bundles of wood. Rhea said that every home needed their own stash of wood to heat with so we made wood. I originally planned to do a cording of wood section like where wood dries out but she said no...it needed to be made so a small bunch wouldn't be an eyesore in the forest. "It looks like some man made it Honey. Fairies would never be obvious about where they gather their wood." I stand corrected and will do as the expert says, so...it was added to the Lincoln Logs and I made little bunches of wood the fairies can pick up and carry easily. I think of earth as what grows from it but Ben said the wood would be fire....so if you think fire too....well....you've got an extra set of fire! And I'm glad these were interpretations.
From the others.”
So, I bid farewell to 2010. You were a great year and I will think back on you fondly as the year we became a family of four.
23 February, 2012
The Commodity equity group was mixed on the week for a net loss of 0.8%. All three are in confirmed downtrends.
KH: We really don't listen to the same music. I like hardcore, post-rock, jazz, Icelandic blues.
I made it to the top at bout 4PM. Rienk and Lily went to get their car. Shafi and Joseph were freezing and hungry (I ran out of food. All I had was half of salami). Rita was still struggling up. I went to wait for the shuttle, but then Rienk showed up. He gave me a ride to my car saying that it would take about 40 minutes in that shuttle (good thing I ran into him). By the time I drove back Rita had already finished. That was good. I really wasn’t looking forward to going back after her. We said some goodbyes and parted.
We’d been warned.
Nex post: I'm going to japan on Sunday!
7:25
After installing the shelf, covering the memo board and making the charging station (read about those here), I was left with a pesky electrical cord.
$8.00 3/4 lb good quality deli sliced beef
8. “Screeched” is the longest one-syllable word in the English language.
to Our Mother of Sorrows,
MADYSON the Irish setter needed a whelping hand after giving birth to 15 pups – so her doggy pal became a surrogate mum.
08. All Day And All Of The Night (reprise)/Stop Your Sobbing/
Completely off at a tangent here, but the Jain temple in Devanahalli has images of Ganesha, Lakshmi and Sarawathi too. It is the Hindu trinity that I do not recall seeing anywhere. It is something that I need to find out about.
"The automatic vehicle location device indicates that the truck stopped at 04:19," said Mngomezulu. The police are investigating a murder case.
"Back in the bedroom, I stand by the window, arms crossed, looking out. No one is on the street. No one is ever on the street. Everyone stays inside. I wonder what they're all doing, if anyone is acting as lost as I am. What would happen if you could lift the roof -- make for a real open house -- and look inside? What would you see? Surely some of the behavior would be no odder than mine" (pp. 195-196).Can't you see it? No people are in the photo I found to illustrate this idea, but it gives me ideas about the people who live there. I do like the way Berg writes, like this, for example:
Recto-Romulus and Remus and fire-ball heights
Is Mick Dodson a “racist”, or does he get a pass from you anti-whites because he`s a non-White?
First, trying to reverse a negative with a negative will never work. When you’re looking at you weight and you’re thinking and feeling, “I’m so over weight” all you’re doing is acknowledging the fat cells. However, just saying “I’m so slim and beautiful” won’t work either. Because deep down you’re lying to yourself. And most of us with any moral compass will sense the lie on a cellular level.It’s still a negative statement.
The care home staff pushed the lady through to her room for some quiet, and some privacy.
You have also learned how to sit from standing/vise versa, but only still if you are holding on to something. You have let go two times, brave little girl, but unfortunately it only proved that you are not quite there yet. You fell on flat on your face :( Bless you heart. You got your lack of coordination/clumsiness honest. Sorry!
Another amendment allows media entities to “be heard” first before any decision to revoke or suspend a licence is made.
It is based on research, but written in a very accessible way. It goes through both the causes of chronic pain and some of the therapies that exist to deal with it. It recommends how you should prepare for a doctors visit. It also takes Swedish medical care to task. The authors talk about a situation that has become much to common in Sweden in the past few years, many doctors surgeries are staffed by locum doctor and they are different every single time you go. The doctors have very few minutes for every patient and what is important for chronic pain sufferers is conversation, that someone takes them serious. The book points out the importance of not having to tell your story every time you go to the doctor. This takes energy. Being met by a doctor who dismisses you as someone who is whiny takes energy. And when you only have a minimum of energy this is stressful.
I said, But don't all the threads come together in the end? and they agreed they did, but still seemed unsatisfied by the way they diverged along the way. I said that Auster was making the point that all stories are contingent to other stories and each story (and each life) is as important as another - this structure, postmodern after all in spite of the seeming greater conventionality, was the author's conscious way of making this point, rather than a failure in storytelling. As for the ending: Nathan relates that, with people saved and all the threads apparently tied up, and newly happy himself in a relationship, he puts his new partner on the subway on her way to work 'only forty-six minutes before the first plane crashed into the North Tower of the World Trade Centre.' Surely that clinches the point, and also makes a point about the precariousness of happiness, and the fact that you therefore have to grab it while you can.
Most mornings. BadDad had to go away overnight on business last week. We missed him, but I handled things fine on my own. I got dinner, spent time with the kids, got them to bed, and everything locked up for the night.
My second Memorial Day I took the boys and we went to Virginia to see Chris' mom. I wanted to spend this Memorial Day with Chris at Arlington. I wanted the boys to see that they were not only, not alone; but that they could still be near their father. As that day went on there were more cameras taking pictures of them by Chris' grave.(One made it to the front page of the Washington Post the next day) There were families that just stood there, paying their respects and as the tears flowed down their cheeks they watched Oliver fix a flag by Chris' grave. They watched Owen pluck the heads of the flowers there and they watched a mother with tears in her eyes as she realized this was her reality, this was her life. Watching her two boys "play" with or by their father...the only way they ever would be able to.
But not too proud. I don’t even want to mention any of my own books today, because that’s not what this post’s about. Today is about Christmas and a story that’s held millions spellbound for more than two thousand years. In that context even thirty degree heat and a chorus of ‘Jingle Bells’ make sense, and so do the most sentimental utterances of Dickens. My cruise is nearly over, I’m heading back to the horrors of winter, but right now I’m raising a cocktail to all the History Girls and all our readers of 2011 - and wishing a Very Happy and Peaceful Christmas to you all.
But the next day, I thought about where Invitee 2 was going, and I’m pretty sure it was to talk about the history of the USA’s States. Although this chap was cut short in his prime-time, an imagined reconstruction here would be useful – if only for the sprouts in Brussels with no brain-stem.
11 Cabinet Secretaries Notebooks. The Notebook covering this period CAB 195/13 was released at the beginning of February 2008.
wings spread in flight.
I suspect I am the only person who understands what the person making that statement means. There are a number of us standing on the verandah of his present home. We are looking out over the valley. It dips down to a creek and then rises up in a perfect curve to the paddock with the sheep in it. They are grazing quietly. There are gum trees scattered on either side of that paddock. There are several willows by the creek. There is rough grass.
Save for the opening match of the round it was goals galore in round thirteen with a grand total of twenty-eight goals scored in the round which included O’Higgins 5-0 demolition of Palestino and Universidad de Chile’s 4-0 hammering of Antofagasta.
Who is loyal
In the “England Expects” blog, under the title “Scared Yet,” Libertarian Party leader Ian Parker-Joseph revealed that the M.O.D. were asking military personnel: “Will you open fire on UK citizens?… In a stunning conversation with a friend, who is a serving member of the Armed Forces, over the weekend, it was revealed that transfers to regiments and other units in the UK on home duties are being undertaken by the MOD based upon whether an individual was prepared to ‘open fire’ on UK citizens during civil disturbances.”
lowering blood pressure due to the high potassium content.
1 investors
Seemed a little strange. I mean, he didn't appear to be in immediate distress. Nothing a little Benadryl couldn't handle, right? But, not wanting to mess around with it, I grabbed his shoes and told him we were going on a car ride. And am I ever glad we went then. By the time we got to the hospital, about 10 minutes later, things had gotten pretty bad.
How would you improve flow?
As I have already mentioned, Clark argues in such a way that even when you do not agree with him you are forced to think much more carefully about your own position. No Christian student interested in philosophy or apologetics should consider themselves sufficiently well read until they have spent some time thinking about the arguments in Clark’s works:”Thales to Dewey, A Christian View of Men and Things, and Religion, Reason, and Revelation).
He'll paint the table bright
I think that graphjam.com definitely has a lot of parody in it. A lot of the “graphs” are factual and/or relating to pop culture things like video games and trends, but a lot of them, in my opinion have a sense of sarcasm in them. A lot of them are how-to graphics that are based on what people normally do, like the “Computer Maintenance Steps” chart, but it highlights the ironically true steps that most people take, rather that the steps that you should take.
Escape from Warsaw - teen fiction
Were I a dating woman (which I suppose I am in theory, but not so much in practice of late) I’d be hopeful about what might be becoming a trend in my life. In the past year, I’ve twice had the promise of romance offered to me by a taxi driver.
Don't let me drown in Egypt," said Tom in deep denial.
These conditions were not present at the Edinburgh Fringe until recently, when ticket prices started exceeding £10 for a one-hour show. With or without reviews, these prices are too high.
Tomorrow night I am going out to eat with my coworkers and then after that I am going to Reykjavik to go clubbing with my bestest :) I haven't gone out since I came here and I am so excited to get out and let loose :)
* Researching government funding opportunities;
Modern medicine is a platform for profit, not health. I know I could get myself into trouble on this topic (and I have in our local newspapers), but this is a topic close to my heart. I know that there are a lot of well intentioned MD's out there, but for the most part, their hands are tied. The corruption happens much higher up.
I did realize how much I depended on food to make me feel better. If things went bad, I ate. If things went well, I ate.
"My heart is filled with gratitude
But when you change that one tiny detail, and simply don’t tell her the answer beforehand, those energy fields suddenly become a lot less reliable. Their effect – and with it, any evidence that they actually exist – completely vanishes.
gold/cream charm bracelet - $6
Pizza day is always a fun day in my house. My kids all get involved, and it turns into a project (and we’re not “project” people). For us, pizza making has always been my husband’s territory, and he’s perfected his recipe over many years. So while it’s much easier to pick up a phone and order, making this by hand is very satisfying and taste-wise leaves the version that arrives on the back of a bike in the dust. So here’s a recipe that will keep you and the kids occupied (and fed) for a while this Hanukkah.
Allegedly, a growing practice has emerged in the industry, where OEM's are requiring suppliers to surrender all of their IP rights in order to win orders from car makers. Most of the suppliers are small- or medium-sized companies, who have invested considerable sums in protecting the intellectual property surrounding their products. More shockingly, the arrangements entitle OEMs not only to use the fruits of their suppliers’ R&D efforts for their own benefit, but also to provide them to third parties. One anonymous development manager described his experience this way:
Here's my project list:
Rather than one party having to give something up, they work so that they can have a relationship but both have their dreams. I find it a very entertaining and very beautiful love story. If you try and skim the surface of it and take only the barest bit of the formula, you don’t get the same intensity, that same investment in the relationship.
The stairway in our house consisted of a short upper set of six thickly-carpeted steps.
What you read on these pages are often confessions of silly (or stupid) things that I have done, adventures I have had, and what I learned from those experiences.
I'll be catching up on things over the next few days, but tonight my house that was nice and clean before we left is already destroyed with suitcases half unpacked and piles of laundry, both clean and dirty, awaiting their appropriate laundering, so I suppose that takes precedence.
Ben Woods
and his friend Frankie :)
We were pretty stuffed at this point, but there was one more thing that I needed before we finished up and that was "Deep Fried Ice Cream".
One GRAND PRIZE winner of a 25 dollar gift card and 5 mystery gifts will be awarded for a total of 6 prizes !
But much to my own surprise, I decided to try another 'healthy' recipe I've been thinking about - zucchini chips!
It’s a wonderful sequence and one of the best in the whole movie, displaying humor, sentimentality, imagination, and a really great song. Any qualms I had about the movie (and my hopes were actually rather high going in) were lost in this sequence and I could simply relax and enjoy everything that followed.
He got up and got in the shower, and I was SO tired, that I went back to bed. And then CPT came back from PT and got ready for work, and Jake left for the bus, and I was still asleep. And CPT left for work, and I was still asleep. And yeah, I slept till 11am!!! I must not be feeling too well! I never do that! hehe.
The parents were distraught but we told them to HTFU, and that their kid's problems were all their fault. You should have seen their faces! We had them booted from the hospital by the police and we never saw them again. It still makes me laugh. I think they got sent to a gulag.
Yep, I was surprised.
In structure, this incarnation is the same as #3 above:
FOR THE GLAZE
The best I could do in the time available was the Warwick Quadrant which doesn't exactly kick the ball out of the park but it is at least not cringing in the shadow of anything and I did quite enjoy the very 80's Po-Mo arcade, which has a good scale and some civic intention, plus it's got a library and a theatre within, like a jaunty Trumpton Barbican.
Animal print cardigan, Josephine Chaus - Goodwill
So anyway, my point is Rev is utter joy and Christmas Rev was everything I wanted it to be. Hooray. Happy Advent (and then Christmas) to everyone- must try not to use midnight mass as the religious equivalent of a kebab (I don't even like kebabs and I love carols).
She lay motionless on the bed, a skeleton in a red silk dress.
4. What’s the best part of running your own bness?
Finally it would not be a true discussion of the First Lady's support for young designers without brining up her love for Thakoon. A favorite of Anna Wintour, Thakoon has quickly become one of New York and CFDA/Vogue Fashion Fund's greatest success stories. The First Lady brought great recognition to Thakoon by wearing it constantly on the campaign trail and to various events.
So what to do with all this spare time? I think I'll brew some beer. I think I will brew lots of beer. With all the free time I'm going to have, I should be able to really fine tune some of my own recepies. I can work on my brewing methods and try to become a seasoned home brewer. By the time school starts, I will be ready.
Those who would control you encourage that line of thought as that is precisely what they are attempting to achieve – the worst (as you see it) – because they believe it strengthens their influence over you. It seems to you that there is little you can do individually to change things for the better and so you allow doubt, depression, and basically negative judgments and attitudes to occupy your minds. Doing this is giving away your power! – giving it away to those who claim to know what is best for you, and who create situations to encourage you to believe that this is so. And those attitudes encourage those with whom you interact to do the same.
The stories that they tell also shows some of the variety of Indian culture and society. Dalrymple explores the byways rather than the highways, the backwaters rather than the mainstream Vaishnavite and Shivite cults. And this probably gives a better picture too, since for the majority of Indians, religion is local, and the central worship is of local gods and godesses.
Simon White
Better Fit
This book is free and given out by Pulmozyme. I contacted their customer service line and was able to get a book sent to me. Another way to get this book would be to contact the CF Clinic's Pulmozyme representative.
Yeah, okay, terrific, that worked out just fantastic for all involved. Hey, hang on a second, how did you even get in here anyway? The fuck is this? You said when you gave the keys back you were just going to head back up to Northrend and not interfere with the goings-on back here with me.
This quote runs in the same vein as the first one. It is important to realize that the way we think can have a profound effect on how things play out. The key to this is realizing that while we cannot control our thoughts completely, we can make a conscious effort to fill our minds with positive thoughts and push the worries aside. In psychology, this is known as the “self-fulfilling prophecy.” Basically, it means your beliefs can influence your behavior to the point that your beliefs will actually materialize. This is referred as a positive feedback loop relating belief and behavior. Imagine you are sprinting against your opponent to a soccer ball during a game. If your mind is tells you, “I’m going to miss it, my opponent will get to it before me,” then you will end missing the ball. Conversely, if your mind does not allow those negative thoughts to the forefront and you only hear, “I’m going to get to that ball, I will be the first one there,” you will end up reaching it. I am not so sure that our thoughts are SOLELY responsible for the way things end up playing out but I have learned that there is no use for negative thinking. If you can just help yourself out a little by filling your brain with all positive thoughts, why not do it? Thus, in the same sentiment I share this quote here in an effort to recognize and take responsibility for the fact that certain obstacles and fears are simply our own creations. We allow them to exist by entertaining certain thoughts more than others. After all, life provides you with enough obstacles; what’s the point of creating even more?
Waters tells the audience they’ll sing “Echoes” as an encore “if we can remember it” he jokes. The twenty five minute epic sounds extremely tight and adventurous. Overall this isn’t the best show from the spring 1975 tour, and there are certainly better sounding tapes available. But for an opening nights it improves as it goes on and is nice to hear the live debut of “Have A Cigar,” one of their best live numbers.
The other difference from last year’s marathon, is that this May, I’m about 10 lbs lighter than last May. My goal was to be 20 lbs lighter than last May, but I was more focused on training hard, and eating for my training, then losing more weight. I plateau’d from my weight loss in September 2011, and have been stuck within 5 lbs up or down since then. It’s a bit frustrating that this cycle of marathon training didn’t have the same weight loss effect as last year, but I am much stronger this year, so I really can’t complain too much.
You can try to win one, as Fluff Envy has generously provided one for one of you lucky readers!
Do you use Word Verification and why? (Better check first)
“We have to be reasonable and respect the decision of the owner.
Against the Philadelphia Flyers, the Devils played far more disciplined hockey, and limited themselves to just a scattered penalty here and there. The longer New Jersey stayed out of the box, the better they played as the series wore on. Philadelphia was a wildly inconsistent team however, thrown off their game by the Devils' discipline which Perter DeBoer stressed upon his team.
Hina’s family returned fromFranceand resided adjacent to our home. The family consisted of husband wife, their 2 daughters and one son. The wife was very pretty elegant and modest lady. What surprised me was the dark complexion and skinny structure of her daughter Hina.
If you have kids, this is a great thing to have on hand in the fridge for snack time. For one, all the ingredients are pronounceable, it isn’t full of processed sugars, and it will actually get them to eat more fruit. Or try veggies – Raw Salted Caramel is even good on celery, seriously!
What you will see in this blog, are board gaming related articles (not only about playing board games, which is a big hobby of mine, but also board game design), tabletop role-playing game posts (experimenting playing solo adventures, as well as playing simple scenarios with my young daughters), electric guitar playing and music production stories (using my home recording studio, based on Propellerhead's Reason and Record recording software), drawing and painting fiasco attempts (preferably using water color), video game articles (mainly Nintendo DS/3DS/Wii, because these are the platforms where I currently play games), writing related stories (where I talk foolishly about my fiction writing failures), photography posts (showing what I like to do with my SLR camera), programming articles (since I, occasionally, enjoy writing Java code in my spare time, even though my full-time employment circles around programming), comic book reports (of my slow progress of reading, mostly comic books), and more.
the lower-case i on the board, turned
I love Foxgloves, but didn’t use them. They mean insincerity. Lavender means distrust, Lobelia, malevolence, Begonia, dark thoughts, Geranium, melancholy. When I went looking for something wonderful like white roses, say, to signify motherhood, I found they translate to: I am worthy of you. I didn’t want to imagine what would happen if Cotton gifted anyone in The Ninth Step with those - not after what he did. I went looking for a floral symbol for the maternal and found it was moss. Moss? Where did they come up with that? Or this one, Locust Tree, green: Affection beyond the grave. Or, how about Lady Slipper, another of my favorites, a gift of them means capricious beauty.
Though many feel it is not much different to its music TV voting show rival, The X Factor.
Eunice demanded that Delmar leave their home, and he did as he was told. Remorse and disgust filled his heart as he realized just how much pain he had caused his family. Eunice was so ashamed and embarrassed at her husband’s actions. She wasn’t sure her health would withstand the stress of it all. However, after her treatments were over, her doctor reported that she was cancer free. Nevertheless, they would have to keep a close eye on her for the rest of her life.
After many travels and much moving between Italy and France with decreased circumstances (she had run through 2 million francs of her husband’s money before he died in 1867, wiping out his family fortune on top of more millions from ‘admirers’), she entombed herself in black, mirror-less rooms on the Place Vêndome in 1878, only venturing at night, veiled, to walk her precious dogs when lighting was more kind.
Regarding New Jersey Rep. Bill Pascrell's claims regarding in Zimbabwe, Sandomir writes:Onexim Group, the company through which Prokhorov is buying the Nets, last year bought nearly 50 percent of an investment bank called Renaissance Capital, a division of Renaissance Group. Quinn Martin, a spokesman for RenCap, as it is called, said it owned no Zimbabwean companies and that its only presence in the country was in stock research. Attempts to independently verify Martin’s claims were unsuccessful.Maybe so, but the Times could have noted that the Zimbabwe government newspaper The Herald, in a 2/15/10 report headlined 1,000 Delegates Expected for Investment Summit, stated that Renaissance Capital was among several companies that "have confirmed their participation."
He said it with such conviction I believed it, the distinct and firm separation between our friend and it, the foreign agent. Like he caught a really bad strand of the flu, and just like the stuffy head wouldn't be "him," the red face and the random crying and the tone in his voice that wavers from venomously biting to pitifully childlike isn't "him."
The afternoon was spent enjoying the local culture while the night was spent enjoying the local wildlife. It’s fair to say that a fair amount of coin was ploughed into the local economy and it wasn’t long before the town knew it had some visitors. The night wore on in various lengths and as the sun came up the last of the crew was getting back to bed as the first were presenting for breakfast.
"Where to now?"
7. “Gosh, what’s for dinner?”
But the Grand Political Machine picked up once again and Wood accepted a deal for 45 days in jail on Huber while his colleagues then voted to merely censure him instead of expelling him. the hot air in the chambers that day must have been enough to float the capitol building right out of the ground. Because that's all that was being made that day -- hot air.
Bridesmaids
Yes, I did stand for the leadership and yes, I did shake hands with Eddy Butler. That was before I saw what a moronic level this party and its structure has descended into, all crying out in the name of Britain and in the name of the BNP. What a fool I have been! It has now come to my attention that old friends, the first that I ever met when I joined the Party in 1999, that do not hold any status other than that of true activists, have been bullied and threatened not to work with me in any capacity. I may have resigned the whip, but for good reason. I am still a loyal member of THE PARTY. Managements come and go, as do leaders, but the stakeholders always remain the same.
“Don’t be difficult.”
watching these videos I have only just realized something very disconcerting: the women they dance with are always young and sharp and quick and muy elegante... why is that? If these old men are considered the living proof that tango is all about musicality and feeling, then why is it that they do not dance with women of their own age, just as musical, with decades of experience, but with a less-than-perfect posture, women whose sharp steps have become blunt with age?
It’s mother’s day, so it wouldn’t be complete without a tasty desert – sticky toffee pudding is always a favourite with us so we shared this one, which was a good size, very sweet, but not very sticky. Good price for the size and taste.
Kaur and his son Amrik have little choice but to cling on to hope of being one with Singh in this lifetime. BSF records still read him as a martyr and the Indian authorities haven’t been able to make tangible headway to secure the release of a martyr”.
So what can we do?
In the early-morning hours of October 15, Mata Hari was awakened and taken by car from her Paris prison cell to an army barracks on the city’s outskirts where she was to meet her fate.
Little Lee is one of my favorite people in the newsroom because he’s just so chill, and he is often our DJ (which is good because NO ONE wants Barry to DJ). He’s also hilarious. I don’t like people without a sense of humor, so yeah. He’s also Haley’s guy to go to when she can’t find it in her to be a hard ass. I guess someone has to do it.
How many of you have in your pocket right now a smart phone or, at least, relatively intelligent one? How many have some kind of computer at home that you use to connect with the internet? We live today in a world of interactive interconnectedness. We’ve come to assume it.
then chop up the squash in small pieces.
bitter resin, root of the Mother’s name,
'This accomplished piece about the hunt for invisible wealth beyond reach of all but hope and timing is distinguished at once by the skill with which – on so many levels – the author renders invisibility in the telling itself. Pared down to the hunger of desperate characters, the revelation is that of a robber preying on the seekers of wealth: a timeless journey of search and disappointment. The author allows the story itself to dictate what doesn’t need telling, details that some writers might well be tempted to render for the sake of a perceived need for verisimilitude. The great achievement here lies indeed in how those details are left hidden, as meaningless as they would be to the eyes and ears of bone-weary prospectors. In fact the pace of the story barely keeps one foot in front of the other; yet the reader is content not to want to hurry things along. The alchemy this writer brings to the page transmutes all that is concealed into a brutal gleam in the mind.'
Friend: Can I come over?
This group has two goals. The first is to bring attention and public awareness to the situation which exists with respect to this loss of an Indigenous language. The second is to hopefully stimulate some action towards doing whatever we can to preserve what there is before it actually is an extinct language with no living speakers.
Guinsoo: Well, all of the ones you asked me to list…
Thursday 10th
The next set of questions is my own, designed to address specifically the intersection of character and world. Since in sf/f, establishing the nature of the world is a major task that must be accomplished at the same time as introducing the character, why not let your character carry your world in his/her own mind, emotions and judgments? These are the questions - which I phrased as though you were the character asking them of yourself:
Filled with fabric, ribbon, buttons, floral and assorted brick-a-brack that inspire your creative mind!
Blended Beauty has generously offered to let one lucky Tweeny Hair reader choose three full size products! And you don't have to worry if you haven't used their products yet and aren't sure what to choose. They have a tool on their website that will help you choose the best products for your hair type! It doesn't get much better than that!
So please donate to the WPI even though the Count ME in event was yesterday, and even if you can hardly spare the money, every pound/dollar etc will bring them closer to finding the virus/culprit and solving this severe and very disabling disease/mystery.
The usual way to understand these inferences is to treat them as involving suppressed conditional premises (i.e., ‘if something is to the north of something else, then the latter is to the south of the former’ and ‘if lightning is seen, then thunder will be heard soon after’, for (d) and (e) respectively). To take this approach is to endorse logical formalism, i.e., to insist that inferences can only ever be good in virtue of their form. Brandom rejects this analysis, and takes (d) and (e) to be good material inferences, i.e., inferences that are good in virtue of the content of their premises and conclusions. Theoretical material inferences are good without the addition of conditional premises, but the addition of these conditionals is not thereby inert. Instead, they serve to make explicit the content of the concepts in virtue of which the inferences are good (e.g., of the concepts north, south, lighting and thunder). In other words, the theoretical inferential commitments which constitute our grasp of the inferentially articulated contents of propositions (and the concepts that compose them) are acknowledged by the use of conditional claims. This is the central aspect of the logical expressivism that Brandom opposes to logical formalism.
*I do want to mention here that if you plan on making this house an outdoor toy, I would recommend setting it up outside. Unless you have wide doors, there's a good chance it won't fit through your doors! We decided to make this an indoor clubhouse.*
1 bested
"Lincoln believe that true liberty could not permit slavery. He decided to use his wartime powers as commander in chief to end slavery.
Average Monthly Pageviews: 5,280
I’m paraphrasing but that’s the general gist of it. Now, Revi and I both have mortal spouses, so I suppose our take on it is different maybe than some of the single gals. YMMV.
The Public Order Act, which outlaws the unreasonable use of abusive language likely to cause distress, has been used to arrest religious people in a number of similar cases.
2. Why?
The house was the biggest one in a neighborhood of giants, an imposing marble job with a formal boxwood garden sloping up to it. He knew the place; they ordered pizzas here every month or so. The driveway was gated and the drill was for him to use the call box to summon a creepy little guy who would complete the transaction through the window of a gatehouse, rather than admitting him to the property.
Father Jacob (Willie C. Carpenter) does battle with a leprechaun (Warwick Davis) on a construction site for a youth center. Before dropping dead from his injuries, Father Jacob is able to banish the leprechaun using holy water laced with the leprechaun’s weakness: four-leaf clovers. The Leprechaun is dragged into the earth by demonic hands. A year later, Emily Woodrow (Tangi Miller) and her friend Lisa Duncan (Sherrie Jackson) go to get their fortune told by a psychic named Esmeralda (Donzaleigh Abernathy), who tells Emily that she will come across great wealth soon, but she must deny it because it will come with a great price and a terrible evil. So, of course, when she falls down a hole during a barbecue and finds a chest full of gold with her ex-boyfriend Rory Jackson (Laz Alonso), she ignores that sentiment completely. Emily splits the gold four ways between her, Lisa, Rory, and Jamie Davis (Page Kennedy), and they mostly go off and waste their money frivolously. But, much as in that prediction they ignored, the Leprechaun comes to retrieve his gold in the most violent way he can think of.
PS Reiki peeps — vote early and often, you know how
1 handful sun dried tomatoes (you shut up, Beast)
Transport companies are coping with inflation by…contributing to said inflation. That’s like trying to solve groin pain by having doctors take turns kicking you in the nuts.
Well, if you sell something on that website, it’s an ecommerce website and you should be honest about it.
There are herbal teas and then there are herbal teas... Sometimes packet teas smell sweet and delicious but have no taste... I feel as if I am drinking colourful hot water. My preference is for fresh leaves and flowers from the garden... mint, lime blossom, verbena, sage, thyme... Sage and thyme are my winter favourites... mint, verbena and lime blossom perfect for summer... I pick the leaves straight from the garden and infuse them with hot water. Fresh thyme is wonderful for the respiratory system and sage is a marvellous digestive... Hibiscus and rose-hip, the dried flowers, make a refreshing summer tea especially with freshly sliced lemon...
Current you needs to know that the future you will one day walk into something as banal as a bar and you’re going to be overcome with joy. Your eyes might even water, mine certainly did. After years of being sidelined you’ll walk into that bar somewhere or down canal Street in Manchester or Chueca in Madrid and you’ll notice a whole lot of people smiling at you. It’ll be us, your new family. You’ll be home after years of traveling turbulent waters. After I came out I soon discovered I was part of a family, a family unlike anything I’d ever known. There was a lesbian woman who helped me find my first apartment, a gay man who introduced me to all of his friends. The gay flight attendant on British Airways who upgraded me to first class (he was so cute!). After a terrible car accident I had in Rockford, Illinois in December of 1999, two incredible gay people, Erika Storlie and her brother Elgine cared for me for months. I was in a wheelchair and then on crutches and they housed me, they drove me, they helped me tie my shoe-laces, and I barely knew them-but there was something that bound us together other than their natural human generosity. Our community is a wonderful thing, full of amazing and kind people and even though you’re not yet with us, you are a part of us. You are a part of our whole.
For more on Ben and his efforts please go to his great website:
The man traveled nearly 15,000 miles to give a campaign speech yesterday. As AP reporter Ben Feller stated on twitter: “He’s speaking to voters at home, not us.”
Christof Lehmann – nsnbc
I had some free time on my hands and an empty fridge so I took myself off to my closest 'farmer's market' to stock up on seasonal produce and have a look around last weekend. Now, I think the term 'farmer's markets' might be over used a bit these days because these markets I went to were definitely not full of stall holders who grew the produce and came to market to sell it. So what is a farmer's market exactly? According to the Australian Farmer's Market Association:
For One: Despite Fox Businesses article that said Historic collapses are when fortunes are made. Pinpointing the fact that those who begin businesses in the low times of “bust” are better off 30 years later than those who started when the market was in a bust.
My passivity.
Their first meeting is a whirlwind sequence as Pettigrew attempts to rouse Phil Goldman (Tom Payne), a.k.a. lover #1, from Delysia’s bed before Nick (Mark Strong), a.k.a. lover #2, shows up. This scene establishes the film’s witty banter as Pettigrew tells Delysia about her encounter with Phil: “I fear that I have outraged his sense of propriety,” to which the clueless young woman replies, “Oh no, Phil doesn’t have one of those.” This sequence also demonstrates the excellent comic timing of Adams and McDormand as their characters race around making the apartment look presentable while also getting rid of Phil all before Nick arrives. The two actresses play well of each other with the free-spirited Delysia in sharp contrast to the prim and proper Pettigrew.
Then it happened, all in slow motion. We slid suddenly to the left, towards the cliff. I reached for my mom. Nick reached for me. My uncle jerked the wheel to the right and floored it. My aunt screamed a cry of terror, my mom grabbed onto the driver’s seat. My older cousin in front of me had a look on his face I’ll never forget. And I knew we were going to die.
Moodylicious Children's Spa and Boutique donated these super cool items! One bottle of Cherry Face frosting and a jar of Salt water taffy face frosting form her children's spa skincare line! They smell sooo good and this line is perfect for little girls that want to feel like rock stars!
EastEnders: Jamie Foreman (Derek Branning)
3. What is your own personnel measure of success for your book?
5:30 p.m.: An announcement is read in Bamanan on Radio Kayira FM — the CNRDR has sent an emissary, Adjutant Souleymane Tounkara, to this station to explain their motivation in toppling the government, and to reiterate that Bamako residents must respect the curfew. Shortly thereafter, my aikido instructor calls me to warn me to stay home and not to go downtown; he thinks I’ll surely get robbed if I venture out into the city.
Eric Hosmer KC R 20
“I’ve been … waiting to get a visa on arrival and that was denied to me, in spite of having a diplomatic passport and I identified myself as an MEP,” Gomes told Reuters by telephone from Manama airport.
Sahibañ warns him that her brothers might catch up with them and urges him not to stop. But Mirza boastfully tells her that, first, they won’t be able to catch up with them and even if they did it would take only one arrow to take care of Shamair, and one more to get rid of her betrothed. And that he had sufficient arrows to take care of the whole bunch of the Sayyals. Confident but tired, he lies down under a clump of trees — and dozes off while Sahibañ keeps watch.
The five pages you attached don't mention either character or any of the plot you cover in the query letter. It's as though you sent five pages that have nothing to do with this query.
I’ve always said that in order to do what you want to do, you need to do what you have to do.
Me: Wanna smell my feet?
I will tell you that as a New Yorker, it's every man or woman for himself or herself. Cars, regardless of laws or unfair size advantage, will compete with you for the roadway and will nearly run you down. And, traffic or not, we run through intersections without walk lights in our favor and dodge traffic.
5) Key to the Highway
Fuck off simpleton you scumbag.
Until a dues ex machina or really just a change in the narrator’s tone realizes that this could upset Jemma’s already set marriage.
to a drunk slur, or a bet you couldn't back.
I recently had another negative revelation, one that was slow in coming because of where I fit in the historical timeline. A colleague who is a famous sideshow artist saw it long before I did, and is pretty outspoken about it. It’s that Letterman’s detachment and irony are actually hostile and harmful to the variety arts I happen to cherish. Mostly because I hadn’t watched the show for a couple of decades I had forgotten about this. I mostly remember Letterman as somebody who helped revive interest in old school show biz…his sensibility was about bringing all sorts of American freaks before the cameras. What I had forgotten was the extent to which he makes fun of them. He doesn’t celebrate them; he makes comedy at their expense. Not along ago I wrote profiles of most of the variety performers who’ve played in my American Vaudeville Theatre. Many of them have Letterman credits. And when I played their clips, I found myself shocked at the lack of respect Letterman’s program showed to artists I admire a great deal. Ultimately Letterman has that Baby Boomer perspective that ridicules the very idea of performers like ventriloquists, rope twirlers, magicians, and so forth as corny, apparently. He is so out of touch now that he has virtually no idea that such performers are vastly hipper than he is. Seems to me there’s a niche there. There oughtta be some space for it on yer television.
“I can’t dance,” she mumbled, keeping her gaze locked on her feet.
Moffat suddenly seems to have become the place to be. Thursdays at the Black Bull are a must for music lovers. A recent concert sold out in hours. Brodies, the restaurant/cafe/bistro whose cakes and dishes I've been posting shots of for a while now, is constantly packed with friendly munchers and sippers (they already have only two tables left for Hogmanay!). And now a major new Alaskan author is coming here as part of her five day UK book launch tour.
The pacing may be a bit slow for some viewers, but a little patience goes a long way. The dark twist at the end was a suitable wrap up, and I enjoyed this movie much more than I thought I would. While it won't be replacing its brethren on my shelves any time soon, it's worth the time and effort to stream it on Netflix while it's available, if you've already seen The Exorcist too many times to count.
Selena got her team photos at the game last night. They turned out so good. We are so very proud of how far she has come in this short time. Maybe dance was not her thing, but she sure seems to be finding her way through sports. She is really beginning to become our little tomboy, and that is perfectly fine with us.
I suppose it is logical to ask, as Peter did when pointing out that they had in fact left all to follow Jesus: “What will there be for us?”
The SST cites Council debt per capita eg Kaipara District $4142; Dunedin City $1920 (Source: Statistics New Zealand)… making DCC almost look good by comparison.
My Beloved is the mountains,
In my capacity as Editor of the Journal of Intellectual Property Law & Practice I receive a good deal of correspondence from contributors on issues of style as well as substance. While questions of substance are usually raised before an article is submitted, those of style generally follow the event.
I hunt because the dog hunting next to me is one of my best friends and hunting means us working together as a true team. She will break ice and swim as far as it takes to get the job done. She will warn me of danger one second and let my daughter crawl over her and cover her with blankets in the other. She will keep my hands warm on cold mornings and keep my feet warm on cold nights in camp. And all she asks for in return is a scratch behind the ear every now and then.
Example 17.1 – Is anyone out there?
Number of South Koreans in PH exceeds Seoul population;
Because of your ability to view things in a common-sense and practical way, you’re an excellent organizer and planner. This stems from a strong desire to be a perfectionist in your labor. Planning is necessary to avoid errors. It’s very likely that a 4 Life Path person invented the to-do list, because it’s the rare Life Path 4 who doesn’t have one by his/her side at all times. You program your life in an orderly fashion that allows you to catalog and manage the flow of ideas and activities that fill your day. You function best when under the gun and facing a tough set of problems.
Now you probably think I am so selfish to even pity myself for missing The Hunger Games. And you are right, I am. But we all are and I try my best every day not to be. I’m just being honest with you here. But let me tell you, I have a Savior who loves me very much. He decided to let me have both.
1 frail
If you need cheap transportation, don’t forget the daily DAC Express bus from the Cadence parking lot in Silicon Valley straight to Moscone Center in San Francisco. Sorry, that’s not free. It’ll cost you $5 round trip. As MAD Magazine loves to say, “Cheap!” Click here for more info.
It’s not uncommon to hear that some Android phones regularly overheat or freeze up or that some models are simply low quality. This inconsistency of quality isn’t an issue for the iPhone.
back their keys to garden, after
— When both M-com stations are destroyed and two new objectives are online, it is likely that there are still a couple of defenders hanging around the position of the stations that just got destroyed. As the attackers will advance towards the new M-Com stations, these defenders will be able to inflict some casualties behind their lines. In this case, the attackers should always look behind their back and if they’re well organized, should have a couple of players cleaning the area.
The maximum size wind generator is 3 Megawatts, which can rarely be attained on a continuous basis because it requires substantial forces of wind. And for the same reason only generate when there is sufficient wind to drive them. This of course depends where they are located but usually they only run for 45% -65% of the time, mostly well below maximum capacity. They cannot be relied on for a 'base load ‘because they are too variable. And they certainly could not be used for load control.
The Ancient One is doing his best to get "off-book" as the Grandpa and enjoys both the richness of the character and the opportunity to play an age-appropriate character. There aren't a lot of really wonderful curmudgeons out there, but Grandpa certainly is one.
Morgan Kaye
Foreign
A view down over the icy lake
Shot@Life educates, connects and empowers Americans to champion vaccines as one of the most cost-effective ways to save the lives of children in developing countries. A national call to action for this global cause, the campaign rallies the American public, members of Congress, and civil society partners around the fact that together, we can save a child’s life every 20 seconds by expanding access to vaccines. By encouraging Americans to learn about, advocate for, and donate vaccines, the United Nations Foundation’s Shot@Life campaign will decrease vaccine-preventable childhood deaths and give children a shot at a healthy life.
Now might be a good time to update folks on how things have been going for me over the last year running in minimalist shoes. I am still LOVING my Vibram 5 Finger toe shoes...but it's been a rocky transition. I'm going to just cut and paste a message I sent to a knowledgeable runner that I admire, detailing my experience these last months with the VFFs- as well as what I felt on this 11.5 mile run. But I will use this in a second post today so that this one isn't so long.
I think one of the biggest changes for me lately has been that I have honestly integrated the idea that it is safe for me to be The Sure One about my life. In the past, I have needed (and still do, of COURSE, from time to time) reassurance from the outside. I need to chat with friends and family, get their points of view, before I settle into what I find True. I am not doing that as much, lately. I am deciding, in more and more lessons and circumstances, that it’s ok for me to just enjoy my life: that my decisions are Good and Right for me, that I can love Deeply, Freely, and without fear of getting hurt, that Abundance shows up in my life, regardless of what it looks like on paper…etc etc etc. A million tiny things that I used to worry over, do not phase me any longer.
You have a county agency up there that has been under fire for a good while now for things completely unrelated to this particular case, and even more under the microscope this past week because of this case – and somebody makes a boneheaded move like that last night?
Favorite non-alcoholic drink: Water, with a lemon please.
06 - Half Of The Fun
Before I explain it, it though it would be best to give you an example. These are two clips I took from the most recent Evangelion Movie, with the Japanese seiyuu (voice actors) speaking in English. Exciting, right? Dear god Kaji...
a houseless porch near a back road curving back
I CANNOT believe that they poor sweet little Bachelorette is crying over that stupid little g.e.r.k (this is really supposed to be a j.e.r.k, however since we have to spell out all bad words, my silly seester spelled out g.e.r.k instead) awe funny times. Good laughs. Now back to the seriousiness...Ashley was forewarned about Bentley prior to meeting him and she still kept him and he played her like a fiddle. Man can that pretty face play the fiddle, ohmygeez. She is bawling her little eyes out and he says she was standing on the couch and she wrapped her legs around and they were in a good position. He didn't like her and wasn't attracted to her but he said he could hook up with her from time to time. I know those guys, I have been with those guys. GERKS!!!! Hopefully it works out for her and she finds her perfect guy, because Bentley wasn't that guy!!!
Reminder and I see 5 days on there are Furlough
It was a good camp – nice view of the Arrigetch peaks (well, we will be looking at them for the next 4 days), beautiful refreshing river, a view of some unnamed waterfall across the river. The people set into their camp routine. There was a lot of massage done, washing, cleaning, gear repair. I managed to rip a sizable hole in my battered inflatable pad. Perhaps it was done during the bushwhacking section. Good thing Igor had some fancy heat activated glue and was able to repair it. I doubt duck tape by itself would hold. One more thing to bring to trips – pad repair kit. After dinner a more advanced group went up to see the small waterfall across the creek. I joined them. We didn’t do anything crazy, just went up to it and took funny pictures. What else was there to do – it was still light.
“This is a milestone in the fight to claw back our civil liberties. Under the Labour government, our civil liberties were steadily eroded by an increasingly over-bearing security state. “Liberal Democrats have done the right thing to clear up Labour’s mess by ending these shameful practices with the Protection of Freedoms Act. “The Coalition Government has already scrapped ID cards and destroyed the National Identity Register and is now making another leap forward with this Act to end Labour’s surveillance state. “The Act stops councils snooping, ends the storage of the DNA of innocent people, reduces the bureaucracy of CRB checks, curtails 28-day detention without charge and bans schools from taking children’s fingerprints without parental permission.” And another release quotes Chair of LGBT+ Liberal Democrats, Adrian Trett:
CANBUS is an acronym used for this specific Controlled Area System, a condition given to the primary control device in the Swift. This technology outfitted in the Swift aids you to transfer data between the car micro-processors and car components. There are 6 microprocessors associated responsible for all engine, Expanded polystyrene, Auto Air conditioner, ABS_EBD, protection and deadlock, and airbag.
-Travel to every continent in the world
When I got home, I took the second valium that the doctor’s office had given me, made up a bed on the couch and slept for a good 5-6 hours which is recommended. Keeping your eyes closed as much as possible helps them heal. For my waking hours, it was prescribed one drop of Pred Forte and rewetting drops each hour and one drop of the antibiotic four times a day. By 6 o’clock, I was awake and watching tv from the couch with no problem.
I have had all the small scratches taken out of my paintwork for the NCT and I was seething with rage.
So far as I could tell, there are relatively few comics in-jokes in this movie, but as the whole thing seems designed to delight the fanbase I doubt anyone will be too upset. While this film doesn’t exactly feature a classic Avengers line-up – I suspect the nature of Marvel’s contract with the people who make the X-Men films means that none of the various mutant Avengers can appear, while absent founder-member Giant-Man is, basically, a bit rubbish – the ones who do appear all get their moments to shine, both in terms of action and characterisation.
“I lived in the early days of the Church. The prophet Joseph came to me for help to publish the Book of Mormon. I didn’t have enough money, but I signed an agreement to sell my farm, if necessary, so that the book could be printed. Who Am I?” (Martin Harris) “The Golden Plates” (This vest is also based on an apron, with ties on the neck and side.)
Help Us Welcome Penelope the Pig
*If you want to keep any of the plastic crap in there you must replace it with item of similar or greater value!
Georges 39
Think about it....
I just looked at her.
What I think about this card now: This was the toughest of the rookie cards for me to obtain and one of the toughest cards in the whole set to finally land. No one likes giving up their Fred Lynn rookies. That's why this one is off-center, miscut and there's a weird printing flaw next to Lynn's head.
Chances are no, I wouldn’t. Because it would be stupid and rude. I don’t know enough about any of those to have any sort of educated opinion, so why would I try to tell any of those people how to do their job. Yet every day non-pastors are telling pastors how to pastor. Non-missionaries are telling missionaries how to work in the mission field. Non-evangelists are telling evangelists how to evangelize. You get the idea.
Excel really didn’t fit my needs, and I didn’t want to use the ‘cheap’ office-suite database applications. They provide immediate benefits, but if you don’t keep up with the upgrades, your data is eventually locked into a dead proprietary format…I’d just experienced that with my comics, and I didn’t want to re-enter thousands of entries every few years.
Sexual submission was his answer to war and crime: “erotic love is the emotional source of that all-important social trait, willing submission to other people, to their needs, their opinions, their manner of living and submission also to the leaders who govern the social group.”
This dark room just echoes with the
- All files should be labeled with your name and title of work.
My husband ended up calling to find out what was going on. They said only the screen needed to be replaced, and they needed payment before fixing it. The cost was $350. We paid it. It hurt us, but it hurt more to have my son without his communication device.
The next day's headlines read "Superman Saves Moon from Doom," while Norm Sythe is "buried" on page 64...the obituaries. What's the lesson of this one? Um...gimme a second...accomplishments should be their own reward, not accolades or glory. No? Maybe, sometimes being overshadowed isn't the worst thing in the world? Don't steal mental energy? Listen to Superman? Ah, I don't know.
As nobody to-day would mint.
Lunch in Kailua at the Ohana BBQ, a Korean hole-in-the-wall place. Delicious plate lunches. I had the Kalbi ribs and chicken katsu and four types of vegetables: Pickled cucumber and bean sprouts, kimchee, and cabbage. Tony had the same ribs and a beef Jun, which was thinly sliced beef that was egg-battered and pan-fried. Oh so ono!
move), I read each and every one. They truly lift me up with each word, and I can't thank you
Here's a recipe:
them to put their names by those that they would use. We held our breath, not sure
‘I’ve met Molly before. I was the crew that took her in yesterday,’ I tell her.
What's the role of advertising?
it is just bigotry.
Time is our most valuable asset. There are always trade-offs and opportunity costs when you spend time on a photography trip or processing your photos, or working on your blog and website. This is all business development time and unless you are a photography workshop leader (we are not), your time is not directly paid for. There is also the “creative funnel”. When we get back from a trip, we may have a thousand images. After review and editing we may only have 25-50 that are worth putting on our website. That means we only publish less than 5% of what we capture in the field.
Hope you will meet a little sweetie pie this week.
Alec Baldwin took his sixth win for Best Male Actor in a Comedy Series at the Screen Actors Guild Awards on Sunday, for his portrayal of Jack Donaghy on “30 Rock.”
Following are excerpts from an interview with Sheik Yousef Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Qatar TV on August 26, 2006.
B. Dan Quayle
(CNA).- A longstanding memorial to veterans killed in two world wars, topped by a non-descript, three-and-a-half foot white Latin-style cross is the latest target in the Ocean State of a self-described atheist and agnostic freethinkers group.
2.) My work contract includes a contract completion bonus, which (post taxes) will be about $2,000.
1. Heat butter and oil in a large pot over medium heat. Add the shallot and leeks and cook, stirring occasionally, until they are soft and translucent, about 5 minutes.
I have a quarter of each, other half is made up of WTF.
Ok that’s all for me today…I leave on Friday for Texas (flying into San Antonio & teaching in Waco)… have a couple of spots open if you’d like to come and have some fun with us! Have a great day!
I only found out last month that Jack Lord, the saturnine star of Hawaii-Five-0, passed away in 1998. I suppose it’s too late send flowers and a condolence card. Who could ever forget that moment in the opening credits when the camera zooms in on the resolute face of Steve McGarrett, standing tall on the uppermost balcony of the Ilikai Hotel? It was a sight to give any watching crooks the willies – and possibly a touch of vertigo as well.
“The parents of the victims could not decide on which teachers would be teaching their children. Indeed, they had no reason to so decide as they were entitled to expect that all teachers in the school would uphold the unreserved trust placed in them and adhere to the highest professional and moral standards.”
PopPop
a good man will be willing
Riverview Diabetes & Nutrition Center invites people with diabetes who wish to better control their weight to attend the “Diabetes & Weight Control” workshop. The workshop includes dietary assessment and instruction designed especially for people with diabetes. It is led by Rebecca White, RD, CDE, a Registered Dietitian and Certified Diabetes Educator with Riverview Diabetes & Nutrition Center.
Add to this what the Lord said of Himself in John 8:12.
“For it’s very survival’s stake, America must reexamine the old presuppositions and release itself from the many things that for centuries have been held sacred. For the evils of racism, poverty, and militarism to die, a new set of values must be born. Our economy must become more person centered than property and profit centered. Our government must depend more on its moral power that on it’s military power.
-You cannot outwait that winter for spring,
I submitted this card for Creative_Sketches "Anything Goes" Challenge, today, and Flourishes "Use Pearls" challenge, this week, on their blog.
We hear walk of equality. We hear talk of freedom. Freedom in the political sense means freedom from government coercion. It does NOT mean freedom from an employer, from a landlord, freedom from the laws of supply and demand, or freedom from the laws of nature. Laws which do not guarantee prosperity to every man.
Total Size: 260 Mb (Incl. Recovery)
He was traveling on a train in Japan, he was hungry, got down at a couple of stations and found nothing to eat. He murmured out of frustration” and they say Japan is a developed nation!” . A fellow Japanese traveler heard him, he got down the train, ran out of station and came back with a basket of fruits. He said to the foreigner “Please except this as a gift and please do not tell any one that you didn’t find anything to eat in our stations”. The incident speaks for it self.
The navy officers immediately ran towards downed vehicle and feeling I should be a part of what was going on, I joined them while leaving Sheri behind. I glanced back once to see her scared and standing next an old couple who had come outside after the craft had came down, it was the last time I saw her alive.
This past weekend we had the baby shower for my sissie Rachel. The only thing she requested (because I told her to shut it and stop being a control freak before she could name a bunch of other stuff) was that it not be a restaurant shower. There's something to be said for not worrying about food prep and seating, etc., but there's a bit more to be said for being able to linger as long as you'd like afterwards and not having to worry about fitting all the gifts into your car lickety-split.
“My brothers and sisters, members of bereaved families, it was the heartfelt duty of our dear ones that led them to face the enemy. It is the duty of our conscience that leads us to stand with eyes closed and not only remember but look toward the future as well. Today, the People of Israel lay aside disagreements and stand as one beside you. Today we remember the fallen of Israel’s wars, all of our dear ones. Each one had a family. Every name has a life’s story of its own; an entire world has been cut short.
My whole life I have been told to be honest and truthful with others or people would consider you to be a LIAR. That was some good advice from my parents and something that I’ve always tried to live by. The only thing that they failed to explain was that you have to be honest with yourself. It’s kind of like love. The Bible asks” How can a man love others if he doesn’t love himself?”. So I question “How can you be honest with others if you’re not honest with yourself?”. So, are you honest with yourself? Mostly, I doubt it. This dishonesty is called many things: Biting your tongue, Being politically correct, Stretching the truth, Telling someone what they want to hear, Sugar-coating, etc. Does any of this sound familiar? Are you GUILTY? We all are. We are all victims of our own making. Why do we say things that aren’t the “honest” truth? Maybe we don’t want to be rude. Maybe we don’t want to hurt others while they’re grieving. Maybe we don’t want to be a “bully”. I don’t have the answers. Not all of them anyway. I know what the Bible teaches me. I also know that not all believe the Bible. So, what do you think?
The team was together from 1874 through 1924. In later years the men didn’t speak offstage, mostly on account of McIntyre’s drinking problem which necessititated the frequent services of an understudy. McIntyre and Heath died in 1937 and 1938, respectively.
PRIVATE JOHN FRANKLIN MOORE
Kang: Abortions for all!
Similar deals occurred in Canada a few years ago, when Molson Coors acquired craft brewers Creemore Springs and Granville Island. These beers now have far greater distribution, but so far their craft brewing values and ways of doing things have not been compromised by pressure from the macro.
I have you to thank and I should thank you from deep down. Thank you for your support and reminding me how pretty you think my photos are, for those of you who have tried my recipes and those of you have been around from day one or who recently stumbled by. Thank you all. I really wouldn't be here now without this supportive community and healthy creative outlet.
Jason Bourne still struggles with the remnants of his past life, and must deal with who he once was. He must come to terms with the pain and death he has inflicted upon others in order to move on with his new life, and to absolve those he has pained of the lies that have damaged their lives. It is powerful and dramatic. It’s the bigger, needed step towards the further evolution of the character of Jason Bourne. He can never live in peace with himself until he is able to come to terms with the blood he has shed. There’s just so much to say about this film that it’s difficult to find the right words to do so. When you see it and are able to absorb it all, you will surely understand. It’s a dramatic and painful journey of discovery for Jason Bourne. Whether redemption will ever come is unknown, but I believe Bourne certainly takes the hardest first step towards that end by the film’s conclusion. However, the film ends on a sly, upbeat note, and that is a sign of very fine and consistent storytelling. I also like the consistently and continuity here from the first film with the reuse of the same passports and identification photos of Jason Bourne to the reuse of Moby’s very catchy tune “Extreme Ways” for the end credits.
We can also know that builders will not undertake new developments unless they can be assured of a modicum of profit.
3/4 cup slivered almonds
Three years later, it is a different legacy that flourishes in me alongside the memory of his powerfully charismatic presence. Shared with my mother, his passion for gardening is a gift that I share with my siblings. We all love our homes and gardens, and for those of you who know the Grey Heron garden, mine is the smallest one of all!
Exsoteric: You've just listed three very timeless beauties. Does that encapsulate your whole design ethos?
No one maintains a perfect record for long in this game, and it’s no secret that fighting a wrestler with Division I credentials is always a tough match up. Also, comfort can be found for the 23 year old UFC newcomer in the fact that a blueprint has been laid for areas of improvement before his next bout (which will also most likely be in the UFC). Additionally, Joe Rogan was complimentary of DJ’s footwork, timing and punching repertoire.
in a way it seems silly to do so, since it will be paid off in 9 years but on the other hand with my husband retiring and bring home a thousand less each month (the house payment basically) it seems like the smart thing to do.
I don’t know if I had mentioned that I have what they call a ‘sense of humor’. So I decided to try it with this girl. “I love to eat babies. Small, chubby, rosy ones like you", I said pointing my finger at her close to her face
1-1-00. Nothing exploded, the world didn’t end (which, after all, is a good thing, but still…).
The schools are full of Crookballs who are all very grateful for my assistance!
MS: There was a very detailed investigation in 1908 and I read a vivid report which contained half a million words and interviews with more than a hundred people. Half the town worked there as it was a very big place. One section of the report describes a young girl being found tied to a bed and nobody knowing how long she might have been there.
"police are looking for a silver or white Chrysler 300 four-door sedan with low-profile tires and large rims"
I’ve seen this in movies, and one of the other students said it best when she said, “this is surreal.” Haiti is beautiful and exotic as it is impoverished and chaotic. I’m not at all uneasy or uncomfortable in this new place, but more curious as to what I’ll encounter on this trip. Already, I’ve seen the confusion of the airport, taxi vans packed with so many Haitians you can’t imagine, and the sharp island heat.
No spot of ground
And being it is February, you can use the coupon code feb10 to save 10% off your entire purchase in the Chomas Creations store!
You might consider checking out "The Mistress of Atlantis," an undeservedly obscure movie that is not as wild as "Hercules and the Captive Women," but which is a fascinating early fantasy film nonetheless. Click here to read my review at Shades of Gray.
2 fancy
This righteousness from Christ does not become our excuse for personal unrighteousness, but rather our only power to confess it and reach out for change. It is our truth for living to Christ and also for dying to self. It allows love to bloom for Christ amidst our guilt, and even enables us to love the one who points out our offense. There is no reason why love cannot rule here: God is at work in the middle of every mistake and He commands every conveyance of correction. When our lives are yielded to Him, we become more distinguished by God’s love. It triumphs in the place of all our weakness. The cross’ shadow is big enough to engulf us in salvation as well as everyday occasions of being straightened out.
And as I started up my car I thought it would be a really stupid idea to drive straight home as it's a 30 minute journey. And I made it to the shopping mall without paying much attention to traffic around me.
is not sexy as it sounds
I came downstairs Sunday afternoon and saw my husband sitting in the living room, and Amanda draped on the loveseat -- both reading. I quickly grabbed a book as I asked, "Oh, are we all reading together?" That's a family activity I can get behind.
Jings, 2012 is turning into a fantastic, vintage year for gigs. I’m loving it.
Spread with sour cream, sprinkle salt and pepper generously. Top with tomato, basil and onion. Preheat oven @ 190C.
Simplicity in form and function, pure movement and total body awareness.
"Uhm, what sound?"
I am seasonally appropriate. I wear brights in the summer and lights in the spring and darks in the fall and bold in the winter.
Now you're probably thinking, What vintage pattern contest? Friends, I'm not a competitive person. But Cathy was so happy with her coat -- which I just happened to complete on the final day of contest submissions -- that she insisted we enter it. When it comes to self-promotion, my cousin has the instincts of Jayne Mansfield.
Steve Rogers: You’re all about style, aren’t you?
Or so it was meant to be, but as usual, most of the checkouts were not in use, and those that were, had huge backlogs.... So, I went along to the rapid self-checkout tills. And blocking access to those were two women, with loaded trolleys*, and kids, gabbing about whatever...
I love the livery of the plane, a bright vibrant colour, which seems like design 101 for a low cost carrier, (Wizzair rings a bell) mixed with a modern font, bold curves and a bubbly feel to it. The nicely balanced colour palette flows across uniforms, websites, branding and liveries. I can’t help but feel the airline uniforms have a fun ‘British’ feel to them, and wouldn’t feel out of place in a Great British countryside picnic (where everyone was colourblind) and they have kept themselves smart, rather than the friendly and relaxed atmosphere the original jeans and t-shirt combo of easyJet when it first started out.
Here’s my Ben when he was little and still in a booster seat! It made me sad to see this because time has flown by! What is this nasty thing called time and why can’t it be frozen???? He has always been my little ham. He has always known how to make me laugh. He has always known how to comfort me if I am sad. (We show our feelings around here and we are proud of it!) He is so lovable, and huggable, and kissable, just the sweetest of the sweets. He will always be my baby, even when he is all grown up.
1 skulking
'Try it,' said he man.
The photos can in no way portray the powerful presence of this beautiful work.
Hi Dean,
9. Shady Girl, Shady Girl (Oberg, Christiansen, La Grand, v. Buuren, Vernon) 2:35
 White Bines which were difficult to grow but the most prized for brewing.
Chuck came a few minutes later and next to Splasher they buried Herkimor.
“Is it too trite?”
a piece I was thinking of working on. It's a bit off topic and political in nature but maybe it will give you an idea for another blog post. I've been wondering about the Republican Party there in the US and how they've been pretty much taken over by theocrats. The thing that bothers me is how they seem to favor things that would be distinctly against the things that Jesus supposedly taught, such as greed, power, the death penalty etc. Maybe you could
At Burlington in Vermont, there was a shooting that left a 35-year old man in “grave” conditions. This event happened around 2 PM, and the man was found around 2:20 PM.
Using a moment of satisfaction
If it is a boy, I will make the name board like I have in the boy's room, that you may seem someday..... and put it over the headboard. I may still do the fabric circles, but with boyish fabrics. We will see!
Garlic Chicken Fried Chicken
I have added a donation link on the right. Please chip in. If you are a man over 40, get a prostate exam.
Our courageous faculty leader, Brandi Minchillo (@MrsMinchillo) reminded me of my role as a participant, gently pointing out to both our Assistant Principal, Ilanit Cury-Hoory (@hoory1) and me that we are allowed to share. I smiled, grateful for the reminder that at times the silence of a leader is welcome and at other times it can be distancing. I jumped into the conversation as an equal, not as a supervisor, in the process gaining understanding into how I can view classrooms more reflectively along with more thoughtful ways I can phrase and communicate what I notice and wonder about on my walkthroughs.
94. I know I don’t look like much now, but I’m drinking milk.
Vampire films are past their sell-by date anyway. Watching slender virgins having their necks bitten gets boring after a while. We gorillas are rump apes. I’d like to see more booty in the cinema, both virginal and non-virginal. I’m currently working on a movie plot about a toothy dwarf who preys on women with big wobbly arses. He is eventually undone by a lady with a posterior as firm as it is enormous, thanks to her daily “buns of steel” exercise regime. The dwarf breaks his teeth on her taut flesh and is led away in shame to a new career as a horse-fellatiator. I like films to have a strong moral message.
I suppose they do.
If you'd like to contribute in smaller increments, I'm still taking donations as well. Small donations will help A TON by covering unplanned and unpredictable budget items (of which there are always lots).
I told andrew that I made a goal for myself, I want to teach myself how to knitt. I passed the first step, buying yarn and knitting needles.
That means I’ll be training in Column 1 and tonight was my Day 1. I did a total of 13 good form push ups. Yay for me! I know this is going to help me build my arm and core muscles, making me stronger. I am determined to finish this challenge so I can finally do a chin up! But also for myself so that I can get back to being able to do push ups without flinching. I’ve got my work cut out for me!
Beauty and the Beast (Alan Menken)
The basic idea behind this is super-simple, but it does take some time! I'd heartily recommend it as a way to while away a winter evening or two, and if you've got kids you could get the whole family involved making snowflakes and put the final display together yourself.
3:30pm-4:30pm
Once the painting was done, it was just a matter of finding the time to help each child put their cars together! All would have gone as planned, but then a couple of days went by without some key volunteers that I had been counting on. So we had to set the cars aside until more volunteers came. Finally, on Friday I had an extra person that could call each child back one at a time to help him or her poke a hole in the lids with a push pin, and then widen it a little bit with a ball point pen. We found out the hard way that if you widen it too much, the wheels fall right off! So if you do this project, make sure that you don't poke a very large hole in the lids for that reason. Also, have a few extra lids on hand, just in case some of the lids fall off anyway! It is very frustrating for the kids when their wheels fall off of their cars!
My sister and her husband made the Easter ham this year and there were plenty of leftovers so everyone took a little home. Besides eating a few sandwiches on Mom's good rolls, here's how we used ours:
Once again, the entire building was open to the fest-goers, which offered a nice glimpse into the operations of the brewery, and some of the projects that were in the works. I always love checking out the barrel aging area to try to get a picture of some of the future beer releases. This year I spotted another batch of Michael, Fred Flanders, Matt, Adam from the wood, and Bourbon Fred from the wood, as well as many other barrels just marked with cryptic symbols I couldn't decipher. In addition to the aging beers, I noted that the brewery picked up brand new fresh oak barrels to work with. I've only previously seen used wine and spirit barrels in my visits to Hair of the Dog, so it will be interesting to see what comes out of the fresh oak barrels in the future.
So far I have read and posted on two of Eudora Welty (1909 to 2001-Mississippi, USA), "Why I Live at the P. O." and "The Petrified Man". (I included a bit of background information on Welty in those posts, so in this post I will just talk briefly about two more of her stories that I was very happy to find online.)
But...ohhhhh...the luxury of the Just So. The ruining of the offer of help from my children as I sigh and fuss about so many things that are really no big deal.
1/2 c. butter, softened
I print out my blog at the end of each year. This year I had to make two separate books cause it was to large to be put into one. So I did the first six months and then the last six months...It worked out great!
Like= 2 votes
There is another advantage to doing this too. Al of that close up detail is much more difficult to handle, the really close stuff in a painting can be assertive with its bristling curlicues and pork rind excrescences. The whole bottom third of your painting might get filled with writhing baroque detail overwhelming the viewer on his way through to reach the middle ground where the action takes place.
Well I went on their website and normally when I go on a website about a company I expect to see an “about us” section in their somewhere, detailing a little bit about their history. Their customer base if they have a mission statement etc. But was shocked to find none of that. But from what I can fathom they have been around for a couple of years now. They concentrate more on the looky likey style of cigarette. They indeed have their own brand which appears to be a very powerful one to say the least. But that is about as much as I can comment on that because I never tried any of the products.
When you pass between the worlds and sink into the water all this changes, and you enter the domain of the waves and weed, of fleeing fish and a feeling of discovery. With simple mask, snorkel and fins (but never, never ‘flippers’) you can pass into this water world, or at the very least float on the boundary between air and water.
For in reality, the “baroness” is Venetia Easterbrook—a proper young widow who had her own vengeful reasons for instigating an affair with the duke. But the plan has backfired. Venetia has fallen in love with the man she despised—and there’s no telling
I notice with the breeze from the curtains that sway
Um, inspired by Provence?! Yes please!
If you are interested, this piece is framed and available. Let me know and we'll talk $$ and logistics of getting it to you.
I think people who really enjoyed this book, had perhaps not read it before. Having read it several times, I wasn’t necessarily in the mood to just re-read it. I had hoped for a story that would be more of a spin-off from the original work, which this was not. I would only recommend this book to someone who really loves reading Jane Austen.
“I guess we could always eat each other,” Mitch said contemplatively.
Then God spoke to Moses in Numbers 14:11.
Ahhh... I can remember when I was still a sweet little foal! Yet (much as I hate to admit it) this book is not all about spells and unicorns. When Lord Hawk kidnaps Natalie, her family and friends left behind in the real world are frantic with worry. Since her father is still drowning his sorrows in drink, it is up to Natalie’s best friend Jo and sulky stepbrother Tim to rescue her. They enlist the help of the Death Head gang by daring them to go trick-and-treating, but what will they find when they venture into Unicorn Wood at Halloween?
with thick lenses and black frames
In the interview, Abdul Aziz had said that the existing electoral roll is clean and “no country in the world has a cleaner one than ours”.
Good conflict: Is constructive. You learn from it and learn about each other
“He paid last month’s mortgage, remember?”
I wake up in the morning, take care of the raccoon, and grab something for breakfast. Typically Cheerios or a blueberry bagel with strawberry cream cheese. I went with the cereal this morning.
Why isn’t Singapore attracting the best Chinese talents? Instead of examining the cause, we settle for their “lesser talents”, many of whom are uncouth peasants from the poorer inland provinces.
The new bottled beer list will be effective on Friday, December 7. The vintage collection has been folded into the listings by country, and separate listings have been added for Belgian Lambics and French Bieres de Garde. This will be the last update in the current format. In early February, I hope to inaugurate a new bottled beer list with far more information than the current listing. Read and print the list here: NABC's bottled beer menu .pdf
First separate the eggs.
Ye find the home is dearer than it was, an’ sanctified;
Into the man built caves,
I'm really cursing the fact that I like my shows so much...dang you, Once Upon A Time and Walking Dead! (c;
Is your product so deeply fucking tedious that you want to hack at your own throat with a rust-encrusted vasectomy scalpel every time you see it? DON'T RUN AWAY FROM IT! Show that fucker in all its glory. Like these. What the fuck are they? Who knows? WHO CARES? They are beautiful, no matter what you say.
Felix
I typically dive head first into depression beginning in October of each year. Well, maybe not dive. It creeps up on me, like an itsy-bitsy spider. As I admire the beauty of the changing colors of the leaves and bemoan their eminent demise, I firmly plant my feet on the concrete and watch that creepy arachnid scurry to face me. Even though I know I am bigger and can merely step on it and end its life, the sight of its icky appendages paralyzes me. It crawls up my pant leg, making its way to my left nostril, navigates its way through my nose hairs, finds an empty space in my brain, and camps out until it is washed out during the first spring rain.
Tour Date: February 27, 2012
Long story short, Cobras' desire to play metal lost out to doubts about the parties involved, and he declined further involvement with the project. Last he heard of "Cyco Eva" (as she was fond of calling herself), she had shunned metal, and had gotten really deep into Myspace and hip-hop. And this is where Chapter One ends.
Moreover, Venus is placed in the sign Sagittarius and Moon is placed in Gemini, both are in the positive signs for the planet, adding to the affirmative results for the film.
Boo, all my cleaned beads are ugly :(
Pepper Powder- 1/4 Tsp.
This is a universe in which everything is connected and everything exists as vibrations. These energy vibrations move across time and space. They touch all aspects of existence. You inform, influence, affect and arouse this quantum field with your personal vibrations. Celebrate this awareness; own your personal power to call forth, to reweave to envision a new personal reality as well as a new reality for the collective.
First thing Paul did with his dough was to head on in to town. Came back with a brand new pair of jeans and a mobile phone. Looked mighty fine, I told him, but wouldn’t be no good to a hungry man.
Talking about Mahesh Bhatt’s offer, Sunny was earlier quoted as saying, “It was deep and enigmatic. And it was for the main lead. That`s the kind of start I`d like in Bollywood. And if things go well I`d like to take up a career in Bollywood.
The big snowflake is made with a die from memorybox and hopefully I can tell you soon where you can buy them in the Netherlands.
SNOW!!
During all of the dance chaos my grandfather was put in hospice care. He has good days and bad days. I like to visit him when I can.
I have been toying with the idea of a new Satnav for the last few weeks, mine still works fine but i am a sucker for new technology.
Intro: “Contrary to the claims by the man who ran the CIA’s torture program, attempts to find and kill Osama bin Laden were hindered by waterboarding and other torture techniques, writes Matthew Alexander.”
Our house is piled up with moving boxes, and I'm completely stressed out.
Please indicate how you may use the internet, education and video conferencing, images of the genocide, personal accounts of people affected by and involved in the genocide and videos to help you achieve a reduction in genocide in Darfur.
Thanks for your visit :0)
‘God judges political power, calling it the great harlot. We can expect from it neither justice, nor truth, nor any good – only destruction.’
it’s nature, you know, something should be done, yes,
Here are two things that are essential for boosting the power on your next tee shot:
Though I think it would be fantastic to work with makeup all day, I do feel a bit sorry for makeup companies.
Goodbye, flannel sheets. (Goodbye, fleece blanket.) See you in October!
There is a public park in the middle of the campus, creating a whimsical effect: colorful slides and swings near classroom buildings and in view from the back of the library. F&M is a college-y college and has traditional aspects such as Greek life, (about 30% of students participate,) a football team, and a politically diverse student body. I heard a parent in admissions explaining most campuses are so liberal but that there must be some sort of “moral compass” in the school that they choose for her daughter.
The machine they used looked pretty old so while they were able to get the measurements they needed to tell us that Baby was healthy and a GIRL, it's pretty hard to see anything but blurs in the pictures they gave me. That's ok though, we saw that she is developed and healthy. She was also being stubborn and didn't want to give us a profile shot.
Tonchin said at last week’s city council meeting that he would not attend the next Montreal island-wide agglomeration meeting if the Cavendish link was not on the agenda. The resident pointed out that previous plans called for the link to be completed this year.
Last Thursday, I was gawking at some girl's outfit at the Roaries, because I am not the most subtle people-watcher. And I said to the people I was talking to, or rather shouted, "DON'T YOU LOVE THE WAY SHE TUCKED IN HER BLOUSE TO HER SKIRT? IT'S SO WELL-PROPORTIONED! WOW!!"
The first question came from a woman who was the head of a business. She had an unusual appearance, which she had alluded to by saying that she looked and felt like a “hybrid” and didn’t fit in with her family, and I had been trying to figure out her exact ethnic background. She said that she had been told she was to do something important in her home country, and she wondered whether she would be going there to live, staying in the US, or going back and forth. She thought that perhaps she was meant to go into politics. This brought forth a cornucopia of images, which, again, I felt like I was getting on my own, not being shown by any entity but her. It looked like she was going to be a bridge between the two countries in some way. I wasn’t sure exactly what sort of work she was going to do, but I felt that she was a kind of cultural ambassador or head of a social organization rather than a politician. I could see her surrounded by crowds of people, who were delighted that she was there. The people were holding banners with writing on them, which I couldn’t read, not because of a language problem but because the picture was too vague. There were flowers all around, as if the event was some kind of celebration. I also could feel distinctly that in this vision, her family was overjoyed to see her. As things were in our mundane present, they missed her terribly; I felt this as a cord pulling on her, which she was resisting. By my standards, this was a spectacular amount of vivid material. I was pretty clear about it all, but I expressed myself diffidently and as if everything was a question, like, “Um, it’s in Asia?”
proof vests, which to say the least is
But check out these three that are currently up for grabs in my online shop:
In the event Taib meets an unexpected fate – death or untoward incident or in the event Awang Tengah Ali Hassan, who is well-fed and does not have the feet to jump over those more senior to him to grab the post of CM , then Adenan Satem will assume the CM post thereby blocking Abang Johari chances.
I’ve got to wonder whether people (children?) whose main social disability is prosopagnosia have been clumsily lumped into the category of autism. It appears that over three-quarters of the autistic subjects did not have a “severe face recognition impairment”, so we certainly can’t say that a severe impairment is typical of the group of people who have Asperger syndrome (AS) in this study, and my reading of the “enhanced perceptual functioning model” of autism seems to suggest that autistic people should have an advantage at visual tasks (Samson et al 2011). We know that prosopagnosia is a fairly common but not well recognized disability, and that the diagnosis rates for things like AS and autism have been climbing steadily for a long time. The question of why this has happened is one that has provoked huge controversy – is there a genuine increase in autism rates, or are more and more people being placed into the category, due to lower thresholds of “severity” required for a diagnosis, or the category of autism indiscriminately devouring other categories of people, such as the intellectually disabled and other uncommon or rare disabilities?
Another more useful phrase from that programme was on a poster behind Agent Mulder’s desk. It said, ‘I want to believe’. I like it because it has a positive flexibility within it. I may not be able to believe, but I’ll seek out the evidence accordingly, rather than a default setting of disbelief which is as inflexible as any other dogma.
Our Social Worker confided in me that just prior to having her first child she moved house and into a small village. She explained how difficult it can be to join established groups of mums and she made it her daily task to find a playdate each day. I took up this challenge when Katie came to join us and I still joke that I'm on a playdate mission. Katie had lived her life until that point in a very busy foster carers house. She was used to lots of children around and we were concerned that moving to a very quiet house with just the three of us would be an enormous culture shock for her. We knew that it was vital that we had lots of playdates.
Dawn Cousins was taken from her foster parents in Oxfordshire when she was seven years old. They had fostered her from birth, and wanted to adopt her, but social services told them not to pursue their application because they were white and Dawn would be better off with a black family. Here she tells how this decision affected her...
Arugula-Strawberry Salad with Fried Shallots
This resulted in a medium sized flood to begin with but all is well at this point.
My DP's are by Basic grey Jovial collection
Sandman Logan is given the task of investigating the rules of society. In the process, the becomes a runner with the damsel above and is chased by his former best friend. During the run, Logan escapes from the domed city and reaches a destroyed Washington, D.C., where he finds an old man living in the Capitol with a bunch of cats (I am sure they are smarter than the cats we have there now.). Logan kills his former friend and returns to the city with the old man, proof that you don’t have to die at 30. But, you can still dial up sex partners if you want.
"Yep. Because they're bad, right momma?"
Another interesting grey area is whether pre-pubescent boys appreciate being hugged by women. It seems to depend on the context. My old circus chum, Smacker Ramrod, was sent to an English boarding school at the age of 8. He told me that being hugged by Matron was one of the few consolations of a miserable incarceration.
I took responsibility only for my part of the problem, which was small. I refused to take responsibility for his portion or to excuse it. I held him accountable for it. And once he understood, he took responsibility.
Walter Parazaider - woodwinds, percussion & b/g vocals
It seems that Nangumba and her husband came over to the U.S. as part of a program run by the Nigerian government, famous for its scams, and what has transpired is this:
Our financial predicament – caused by my loss of income when I was once the main breadwinner – has led to an enforced curbing of my Amazon addiction, but I do still succumb occasionally. (Although I’m not overly fond of Amazon, in all honesty.) Borders – oh, how I loved Borders even if it was the most expensive way to buy books; I could spend hour upon hour in that place! – is long gone. Waterstones has abandoned their three-for-two signature offer, but I still try to pop in and buy a book or two in there from time-to-time as I don’t want to see our town’s only bookshop disappear (does The Works, from where I do sometimes grab low-price books, count as a bookshop?). I have an e-reader which I load via Kobo when I can afford to, and our local library is excellent. Plus, my daughter gave me a £5 WHSmith book voucher that is valid from next week. I can’t waste it, can I?
The IDF has issued emergency call up orders to six reserve battalions in light of new dangers on the Egyptian and Syrian borders. And the Knesset has given the IDF permission to summon a further 16 reserve battalions if necessary, Israeli media reported on Wednesday.
From the publisher: Evil never dies. . . After escaping the horrors of the Dark Dimension, Elena and her friends can’t wait to attend Dalcrest College, the beautiful ivy-covered campus where Elena’s parents met. Life with Stefan is better than ever, and with her closest friends Bonnie, Meredith, and Matt by her side, Elena knows it will be their best year yet. Even Damon seems genuinely changed and is getting along with everyone. But for Elena, moving away from Fell’s Church doesn’t mean she has left her dark past behind. When students start to disappear from campus, every new acquaintance is suddenly a potential enemy. Panic soon spreads and the friends struggle to protect each other. Then Elena uncovers a long-hidden secret, one that shocks her to the core, and realizes tragedy may be unavoidable. Will Elena outrun her fate? And will it be Stefan or Damon who catches her if she falls?
My personal favorite one is the charge from her son who suffered great emotional distress because she sent him a birthday card but 'neglected' to include a check or any cash. Nor did she ever send the poor suffering dear any care packages while he was away at colleges.
I'd spend an age chained to a rock
If asked by managers, “‘Do we run a risk of legal liability?’ I would say ‘Sure,’” if a company’s picture showed only two African-Americans in a staff of 100, said Northeastern University’s Roger Abrams, a left-of-center law professor and former dean of the Rutgers School of Law.
Nate: Yeah, Daddy likes whatever me and Georgia likes.
Certainly this method is less rigid and more child-centered than the basic public school concept of classrooms of students working through an inflexible curriculum in lock-step but it is only child-centered and child-controlled within the larger context of absolute despotic control by the Montessori teacher and curriculum.
In hindsight, however, nothing of the sort is necessary. In fact, Kissena Blvd uses the block numbering system common to Queens and developed in 1911 by Charles U. Powell, a chief engineer in the topographical bureau, who modeled it after the Philadelphia grid system. There is a method to the madness or what the New York Times referred to as the "vexing vortex of the Queens street system."
i love the blue they use
announced the completion of a delivery portal for Commissioning support for London (CSL). The creation of the new secure online portal provides National Health Service (NHS) commissioners with access to a set of tools to help them monitor how their providers are performing. This is another example of private
NO. Not, "tata" as in nipples, you sick bastage. I didn't just proclaim "I'm going to be a NIPPLE!!!!!" as a reason why I have no time to write. "Tata" is short for "Tante" = AUNTIE!!!!!
By Greg Harkin
I had some hopes for Chelsea and Mark, but I’m not expecting much. The judges were right on with what they said last week (except for Bruno) regarding the lack of actual ballroom dancing. I have a feeling Mark’s ego will overcome his good sense, and he will choreograph another hip-hop-ballroom-zombie and call it Cha Cha.
said his mother, “I will be a Koala, and I will rest in your branches.”
Zuma repeated the call at public meetings in the province at the weekend.
So what is the topic for the my last host of Things I Know? In honor of my successor I'm telling you the Things I Know that are Good, Bad and Unnecessary. Genius right?
Even when the writing does not go well, when I can't write a sentence that pleases me, I still learn something new. Did you know that 'fadge' is Victorian slang for a farthing? Fadge became the name of one of my characters this week. Here's how he introduces himself: "You know why they call me Fadge?” He spat. “’Cause my life’s not worth a farthing.”
Yet the Labour government made little effort to block this unpopular takeover. As for the Tories, David Cameron said at the time: ‘We are an open, global economy. We cannot start creating ownership barriers, trade barriers and protectionist barriers.’
The council deferred the decision in order for a site visit to be carried out on Tuesday this week.
I will be the first to admit that I suffer from verbomania. It’s a real word, I’m being veridicous, although perhaps a bit versute and I’m making myself vertiginous. Okay enough of that! Feel free to consult a dictionary, I know I did.
I saw these pictures as I was taking a break from gathering information for my tax forms. It was then that I noticed how closely the wolves resembled IRA agents. All I can say is that if the IRS ever goes away I will shoot the first person that wants to reintroduce them.
As a fellow warrior poet, I know that I still make mistakes, misread situations and other people. Sometimes I misfire, say the wrong thing, overshoot, et cetera. And apologizing in those situations is not superiority bowing down to mediocrity or the like. It’s a simple admission of the facts: I don’t know everything; I’m fallible, human; I am not inside the other person’s head; I’m not God; I’m not omniscient; I don’t know the whole of what it’s like to be the other person and to have experienced what he or she has experienced. And so all of that seems to dictate some level of humility, it seems to automatically require that I temper whatever wisdom and insight I may think I have with a little bit of “but I could be wrong.”
In Summation. While life is far from perfect anywhere, Asia has some useful life strategies to offer the world that were once endemic to the west. The kind of hours and effort people put in in a lot of Asia are excessive, and do not allow people time to think, but it is also worth noting that as long as consumption (of products or services) is our main mode of economic activity, people have to remain busy and confident to keep full employment.
Looking forward to spending some more time invigilating this one… although also slightly nervous after hearing that the contents of this room are insured for more than it cost to build the gallery. Eeek.
Yup, that's the one, up there. A book full of love.
The lyrical concept of "Army of Me" (Bjork in tough-love mode telling a self-pitying friend to shape up) was suggested by the implacable, monolithic groove, not vice versa. "A lot of vocalists just sit in the corner and get tortured over the lyrics," says Massey. " But being a formidable musician as well as a singer, Bjork develops melody before words--the lyrics all start out as this wordless mumbo-jumbo. That approach works very well with electronica, 'cause you're forming the music as you go along. We'd get a lot of material down on the computer, and then it was like dressing up--'try this, try that.'" In the "electronic playground," Bjork comes into her own, says Massey, because of "she's one of the few artists who has a real streak of innocence".
It may be challenging for students to find motivation to reach set goals. People may be intrinsically or extrinsically motivated to succeed. However, there are different theories about what motivates behavior. Some people believe that reinforcement is necessary for people to truly feel motivated to change behaviors. Albert Bandura is a name often associated with discussions of motivation and learning. Bandura is a Canadian psychologist responsible for social learning theory. Along with Skinner, Freud, and Piaget, Bandura is one of the most frequently cited psychologists. Bandura believed that reinforcement alone did not account for all learning or motivation. He felt people could learn through observation, intrinsic reinforcement, and modeling the behaviors of others. Intrinsic reinforcement occurs when people receive an internal reward, such as pride, satisfaction, and a sense of accomplishment.
Do we write for ourselves, no matter what the cost in time, effort and the possibility of a complete lack of recognition?
Dyes – See Colors.
By falling in that kind of love with yourself. Take care of yourself. Tell yourself how beautiful you are. Tell yourself that you are fully accepted exactly as you are. Walk past the mirror, pause, and earnestly mutter “Damn…” under your breath. Admire your muscles flex in the gym. Make you your background. Notice your skin while you put on lotion and be present to how good you feel. Look at that part of your body you don’t particularly love (if there is one!) and realize it’s a part of a whole that makes up this mind-bogglingly incredible person. This part of your body is not you – it’s a part of the vessel that you reside in. Your dream partner already knows this and never focuses on it, if they even notice it.
Will you decide now to follow Jesus?
The implication for Jesus’ prayer is this: As in this passage, where God will remove the cup of his wrath from his people after they have drunk it, so Jesus prays that the cup of God’s wrath for sin, which he drinks for all, will in the same way be removed from his hand by the Father after he has drunk it (335).
making up for a century of abuse, greed and violence.
I'm not implying that either style of play is preferable. In all honesty, everyone should have a little bit of both styles of play. If I have a player who is seriously wounded, I should hang back - as long as everyone else is fully healthy. But I shouldn't hang back if we're ALL badly wounded, just to let others take the blows.
The room is nice. I foresee I will spend little time in it as my duties here continue to increase, so its small size is of no consequence. And they made sure the bed was big enough to fit my tall form! I tower over many of the humans here; only some Night Elves I can face more eye to eye.
The race is less than a week away now. YIKES! I'm definitely nervous, but I know that the training I've had will help me get through all 13.1 miles. I managed to get 12.5 done a couple of weeks ago and it wasn't nearly as terrible as I thought it would be so I know I can do it! Plus, I met some nice girls and ran with them which makes the time go by so much faster.
If I had to pick just one book, it would be Bridget Jones: The Edge of Reason. It just never fails to make me ridiculously happy. Also, I am in love with Mark Darcy. Forever and always.
6) We think and act with a sense of urgency.
I wish forgiveness was as easy as she thinks it is. My heart seems so complicated. My daughter is my mentor.
for a while, and gone my way
According to this ideology, children would learn to read as naturally as they learned to talk. If they were surrounded with good literature, they would pick up a book and begin to read when they were ready. They were taken to the school library often and encouraged to choose books they found interesting. Picture books were fine if that was their choice.
Next week: Sophie throws Laura’s stuffed animal in the pool and shit goes down. (I honestly wish that sentence was a joke but that is actually what they show for next week’s episode, I can’t make this shit up.)
Jose Cardona, 32, New York, N.Y.
The x-ray showed a tiny fracture line along one knob of my radius bone. Didn't look too bad, but she said a cast would be needed for a week, then review by an orthopod.
Blessings and hugs,
Tote Bags
It is troubling to note that we are seeing a similar trend in Britain, you only have to look at the pictures of the 26 teenage murder in London alone, to see that they are overwhelmingly black although the media does not say so, we can be sure that none of the black victims were killed by white assailants, because if even one had been our media would most certainly let us know.
Keep in mind that I was already working, without a work permit. My school was actively paying me and paying the French government's social taxes for me. But I didn't have a work permit. Awkward!
Me: You mean reverse racism? (Hindsight is 20/20, I just handed him the conversation on a platter)
Thanks very much to Melissa Goemann and Mike Mage for inviting me to the meeting!
The 5th of May is not nearly celebrated in Mexico as in the USA. 5 de Mayo marks a day in the year 1862, when the Mexican Army won a battle in Puebla, Mexico against the French Army. General Ignacio de Zaragoza fortified the Cerro de Guadalupe against the French invaders, and on May 5th 1862, his 2000 men defeated a frontal attack by 6000, many handicapped by diarrhea. This rare Mexican military is the excuse for annual celebrations and hundreds of streets named 5 de Mayo. Few seem to remember that the following year the reinforced French took Puebla and occupied the city until 1867. Touché! Nowadays on 5th of May, all Mexican men that registered for military service have to swear their loyalty to the national flag and the institutions that they represent. This year it will be 150 years since the Battle of Puebla and the city Puebla will host a unique festival with a re-enactment of the battle.
I am in LOVE with this new set. We have some Magnolia trees here in Iowa, but they are not like the Magnolia trees in the south. In AL we had a beautiful Saucer Magnolia tree in our front yard. The blooms were the prettiest shade of pinky purple, then they open and are white on the inside.
I dont have too much time to write, since I have to get home for my last lunch with my host family. Its bittersweet moving on. I have met some truly wonderful people here, but we are so excited to continue south to the desert. We will do our best to keep you posted, but obviously internet will continue to be challenging.
After the crazyness of M&M world we decided to have a wander along and found ourselves on Carnaby Street. I excitedly noticed that Monki and Cheap Monday have shop spaces there and will be opening their stores soon. I predict a mass blogger pilgrimage when the stores open. I love Carnaby Street at Christmas, the decorations are so pretty.
Our annual scavenger hunt for school SUPPLIES starts with a preliminary stop in the home office to retrieve last year's leftovers and update lists with truly needed items. For example, the new box of pencils required for Max, did not make it. Afterall, Leo finds pencils on the street all year long ;) - and we have plenty mechanical pencil refills. The disposable wipes on Leo's list did not make it either. I volunteered to purchase reusable ones instead.
encouraged me to assume all was well, since there were no apparent
Because this beast, at which thou criest out,
One of the lovely moms I spoke with in Orlando suggested I try having him do activities that involve crossing his body. Something about creating new neural pathways between the two sides of his brain. I figured it couldn't hurt.
So I’m going to base my initial draft of the series on Shaw’s article, along with my own elaborations thereof. But I’m hoping that by publishing the series here, I might be presented with some additional resources to consider and arguments to address. That way, I can expand on what I initially say and build a fairly comprehensive database of arguments for and against cryonic suspension.
And the highs are dizzying. Lenslife is the repeat player, all big brass and euphoria with a chorus that's unexpected every time you hear it – it sounds like Eno and Byrne have parachuted into The Maccabees. But it's nearly matched by Tightrope, which is a bit of an indie skiffle all told, only with drunken Beirut horns and discordant piano giving it some welcome weirdness. By its end, it's hurtling towards Dexys-patented amphetamine soul.
to fret and stare into the dark,
Yes, I'm tired. May the children of Israel's south have a quiet night, a safe night. May we all have a quiet night and may the Mary Shaws of the world understand the most fundamental of truths - that there is a world of difference in pinpoint strikes that target those who perpetrate violence and terror, and those who fire rockets at cities, civilians, schools...and a nation who has done more for peace than almost any other.
Although the UK has not adopted specific rules to implement Article 11 of the Enforcement Directive in full, the High Court nevertheless will have to abide by the full text of Article 11 when granting an injunction and can injunct intermediaries such as marketplace operators. The injunctions must be effective, proportionate, and dissuasive—which may not be straightforward for the Courts to ascertain.
When we consistently fail to place people in the right place within the team, several things inevitably infect our team like an angry parasite. Morale suffers, people lose their willingness to play as a team and confidence erodes. As a result, potential goes unrealized, progress is hindered and our competitors benefit.
Who is “My spirit?”
Sadly, I don't have a before picture of the mirror, I only thought to take photos after I'd dismantled it, but you can see in this one the pink with brown blotches fabric (top left). And my dressing gown sleeve.
A number of gentlemen who reside in South Brooklyn were having a friendly chat upon various topics a few days ago at Masonic Hall, when the conversation turned upon the subject of supernatural appearances. Several of the party told of strange experiences they had had during their lives, and Mr. Benjamin R. Hicks of Fifth Avenue, related an adventure that was so strange that it made a deep impression upon the minds of his listeners, and was not laughed at as other stories had been. The story he related came to the ears of an Eagle reporter last evening and he sought out Mr. Hicks. He was found busily engaged waiting upon customers at his place of business.
I tried to eliminate the hardware from the equation. I attempted to hook up the BT Serial modem directly to my USB to TTL adapter… but nada. The bazaar thing was, when I connected the BT serial TX and RX together, it echoed fine (tested by sending chars through BT serial on CPU). Maybe it’s the breadboard?
Then I have another dream where we’re hanging out in the afternoon getting lunch or something.
This is where I share my secret to perfect grilling, every time, I swear to God. Get your supplies ready:
I have been planning my daughter's Birthday Par-tea!
So here goes….
“Therefore we also, since we are surrounded by so great a cloud of witnesses, let us lay aside every weight, and the sin which so easily ensnares us, and let us run with endurance the race that is set before us, looking unto Jesus, the author and finisher of our faith, who for the joy that was set before Him endured the cross, despising the shame, and has sat down at the right hand of the throne of God.” – Hebrews 12:1,2
At first, this seemed weird, and not just because it's odd to drive around in a cenotaph. (I've been waiting decades to use that word.) I mean, cars don't last forever. Are there tearful scenes when it's time to trade them in? ("But--but the Chevy is all we have left of Grandma!") Is there a scraping-of-the-decals ceremony? Do the cars have lower resale value because they seem haunted?
Air Conditioners and ceiling fans should be used in tandem. Make sure the fan is switched to push air downward. It may seem more logical to reverse the fan so it is pulling hot air upward. However, the downward airflow creates a “wind chill effect,” which makes you feel cooler. On the other hand, exhaust fans in the kitchen and bathroom can push cool, conditioned air out of the house. They should not be used more than absolutely necessary in the summer.
It hasn’t quite worked out that way. Once in government, the Conservatives cut the corporate tax rate from 22.5 per cent to 16.5 per cent, with a further reduction to 15 per cent slated for next year.
Bread From Heaven:Peter never claimed “to be the first pope” as such. Jesus proclaimed him as such in
It seems that message did finally break through. In September, the young woman tried to leave, but was allegedly assaulted by Boston in an alley. She ran for help to a nearby business, where police were called.
Big signs. Little signs. Silly signs. Practical signs. Serious signs. Funny signs. Punny signs. Advertising signs. Convincing signs. Confusing signs.
Honest men like me
Also, these delicious Potato Latkes make a great appetizer or side dish any time of the year, not just for a holiday celebration.
but its tougher than what I usually make. ;)
for the salad;
He knows that he can have toilet paper any old day.
There is absolutely no doubt in my mind that the 3000-plus farmers (Boers) who have been murdered in South Africa so far, were all Christian. (For more info. visit the sister blog TIA 4 CHRIST, to view the article: The Persecution and Genocide of Christians).
Of the artists she tells us:
It’s quite obvious in today’s world that we’re lacking readily available contraceptives for men. Unless you’re talking vasectomy (permanent and only sometimes reversible), spermicide (which is highly ineffective), or the pull-out method (which is a total joke), men are pretty much devoid of all the contraception options that women are offered. Well, perhaps not anymore. Enter Reversible Inhibition of Sperm Under Guidance (RISUG).
Starting with espousing behaviourism and reminding us that language is much more a habit than we realize, and that we can make what we drill meaningful by utilizing substitution drills etc.
I would never wish this experience on anyone. The cancer I went through is meant for little old ladies winding down at the end of their lives. I am one of few cases who had the rare privelege of going through it at 31-32. It’s truly ruined my life. I felt grateful to be alive and happy just a month ago. Now I wish I felt nothing.
Sometimes at night I awake.
Tarte LipSurgence Natural Lip Tint in Moody
A headache kept me home today and it turned out to be fairly interesting....
H. P. Lovecraft – Herbert West: Reanimator
The Ancient Pythoness
I made a tutorial on colouring the sea using copics and pencils for the Copic Marker Europe blog and have since made a card for the Make It Crafty new Store Blog. If you haven't popped to either lately you really are missing some amazing talent.
Saturday, I got to work priming some pieces that have been on the to do list for a while. Today, I painted those pieces. I don't mind painting. In fact, I'll pretty much paint anything if it will make it pretty. However, I tend to paint everything white. It took me some time to get used to this:
Until her mom came after her with a gun…
My husband put together both the double stroller and one of the cribs tonight. It is amazing to be to the point where we are actually doing this. Up until this point, it has been real but not real if that makes any sense.
‘Homes to inhabit. The present idea of the street must be abolished: DEATH OF THE STREET! DEATH OF THE STREET!’ …
With sunglasses on, I looked around to see that the colours of late summer were intensified dramatically.
The Unique Women in Business group is a worldwide group of women supporting other women in business. We teach each other, support each other, cry together over losses and failures, and we celebrate together our wins and achievements. This group not only has a special website with items to help you make your holiday purchases called My Unique Gift Guide, but now we have a special event scheduled for Cyber Monday!!
Ali Smith
I have come to learn that while the hybrid car is indeed a fabulous fuel-efficient vehicle, it does have a few quirks, and even (gasp) an occasional drawback.
If you want a career as a writer, why consign your book to the bottom of the publishing pond? Start at the top and work your way down. Try for an agent first, then smaller presses, and then e-presses before you decide to self-publish. Why be one of thousands of writers selling only ten copies? Strive to be one of ten authors selling thousands...MILLIONS of copies.
"The desire to create is one of the deepest yearnings of the human soul. No matter our talents, education, backgrounds, or abilities, we each have an inherent wish to create something that did not exist before. ,. . .Creation brings deep satisfaction and fulfillment. We develop ourselves and others when we take unorganized matter into our hands and mold it
Follow the pattern.
On a Wednesday I spend a day working on PR matters for a womens' enterprise agency.
connection with the
St. Catherine of Sienna questioned Our Lord about how to tell a true
3 manipulate
[...] The 7th Inf. Div. is scheduled for activation on Oct. 1 of this year, and a commander is expected to be announced in a few weeks. Personnel will begin arriving in early summer. Joint BaseLewis-McChord has had problems with soldiers being accused of murder and other crimes as well as a high suicide rate. Per the Seattle Times: "The base has grappled with other tough issues, including a surge in suicides to a record level in 2012 and complaints by some soldiers that doctors had reversed their diagnoses of post-traumatic stress. There also have been acts of violence in the Puget Sound area involving the base's soldiers or former soldiers."
Hand back the strip of paper with the primary painted circles and secondary painted paper.
Yes, BFF dude DG will go on at least one date in 2012. Happy? She is making a public announcement. Sardar, now you know bahanji’s life is not for every one. It is hers and it works for her. Kid you have to make your own, there is no manual on how to live life it is live and learn but also learn from others’ mistakes you don’t have to make all the mistakes. You’ll have to get out there and take risks or else how will you know what could have been… What ever you decide DG will support you but just be safe.
6X National Coach of the year
attitude of rebellious defiance, confronting it with our refusal to be less
The picture does this toy no justice. First of all he’s got two motors, both with speed settings, one for outside, one for inside.
In truth, it does usually take some work, but armed with a little insider information, you can approach the dating game with confidence and even have some fun along the way. So, what are the secrets of the guys who always get the girls?
Then we had Police Constable Kerr's murder on Saturday. We all know there have been many other fortunate "near misses" in recent months but when a life is lost it always feels completely different. On the radio I hear of talk of dialogue, on the radio I hear talk of negotiations, but all I want to hear is talk of prosecutions, and all I want is justice, for the family of Ronan Kerr and all those other police officers, who live and serve with themselves and their families under threat.
"I was too tired, duh..."
Organized religion is what I find hard to swallow. I believe that it's often used as a tool to control the masses through fear and hate. Do as I (your religious leader) tell you or you will burn in hell. Hate these people for they are different (don't agree with me/ have land or something of value that we want). I don't think the Bible is the literal word of God, but rather man's interpretation and used to reinforce whatever the church wants you to believe.
Or for $299 they will let you do your own formatting, and then upload the book to retailers for you.
Another good 'cook once, eat twice' meal is to make spaghetti bolognese or a lasagne one night and then keep some of the mince aside and make baked potatoes with mince and cheese another night. Yum!
If interested, please email whollycraftclasses@yahoo.com with your contact information, a summary of your teaching/training experience and detailed descriptions of the classes you would be interested in teaching. Queries must be received by 12pm on Friday, August 20th.
This is another instance I hate about the craft: determining what’s important to share. I think had I not taken care to graciously omit certain things from the initial posting, I’d have generated some alarming messages about my sanity. I could go forth with all sorts of little posts and censor this and that, or I could jump right into it and let you know exactly what’s going on.
Grade 1 success:
Easy Turtle Pretzels
Or with making it illegal for foreign companies to break their promises about keeping jobs and research facilities in the UK. Or with forcing them to declare how much of their bid is based on debt. Directors of British companies could be banned from cashing in on a shares bonanza if a deal went through.
it repels avian histrionics with a forbidding
Using sukumo - composted leaves - doesn't provide any shortcut to the rest of the dyeing process. Compared with other Indigo dyeing methods, the Japanese way requires more sensitive care throughout the process because they have to keep the bacteria alive through the entire dyeing session!
Mirror me is wearing a solid green shirt.
Mr Henderson contacted his M.P. Frank Dobson to complain of the way the media had treated him, and asked for an intervention on his behalf. On 3rd August 1995, Mr Henderson received a letter from the black Labour politician Diane Abbott, telling him he had "no appreciation of acceptable terminology. As an ex-journalist, and someone who still dabbles, I believe that we have a duty to write on subjects we know about". Later Ms Abbott objected to "blue-eyed blonde" nurses from Finland tending coloured patients in her East London constituency!
Another Friday wellness post. BOOM.
I used two colors, China Glaze’s “Dance Baby” and a black color from Savvy (it doesn’t have a name…name it yourself if you want).
Third, Bob continues to miss that Leo XIII laid out a principle—Pope Leo XIII calls it a “rule”—of interpretation. A principle or rule, by its very nature, applies broadly. Therefore, he doesn’t need to tell us specifically all the instances where it can be applied. Far from it being my burden to show that general principles or rules apply to a specific case—in this case the matter of geocentrism—it is Bob’s burden, precisely because these are general principles, to show that they do not apply to the matter of geocentrism. This he certainly won’t be able to do, because the principles plainly do apply to that topic.
Maestro Carlo Maria Giulini (1914-2005) achieved the
There's no one recipe, but some of the ways Briggs-Martin does it are:
My first husband, Ron, a bar manager with a keen sense of what his time was worth in cash, called my writing my “volunteer work.” This maddened me because I was a newspaper dance critic and always paid—although at the peak of this career, writing some 50 articles per year, I managed to pull in no more than $2,500. My husband could make the bulk of that tending bar on New Year’s Eve alone.
"No! It's way too cold to swim, silly!"
N. B. from the Directorial Staff:
Most of all be attentive to yourself: preserve a sober mind and an untroubled heart.
One of my resolutions this year was to take better care of my car. I mean, I love my car, don't get me wrong. I really do but it is really over used and seriously abused. I haul lumber in it. I fill it up thrifting. We eat on the go in it. I run errands in it. Over time (like a few days) it's full or stuff. And if I ever get around to cleaning the 348 items I bought the day after Christmas, I'm going to keep it clean.
I would like to tell you that today's class was a success, and it sort of was. Littles did great as usual, Boog on the other hand.......well not so much. He spent most of his time running around and only participating in what he want to.
If you’ve read any of my other blog entry you know exercise is the other point of the weight loss pyramid (the last being mental well-being). Exercise helps to keep your blood vessels supple and flexible. It may also help to reduce the amount of cholesterol in your blood stream. Shoot for at least 30 minutes a day most days of the week to help reduce your risk of heart disease.
3. Turned in Chapter 14 questions. Chapter 15 will be posted on Google Docs tonight.
Aren't those little angels sweet? The layout pic will enlarge for you
Still, she listened to the game and wished she were out there. She wished she didn't have to take care of her mom after a night at the bar. She wished her dad had never met that guy who needed a body guard. She wished that she didn't live in the beat-up, rundown trailer with trash in the yard. And most of all, she wished that the lilac dreams were real and she could fly away to a better place.
But the US must be told the metamorphosis of Boko Haram is not yet complete. Yesterday, it was about Borno State; today it’s about national politics; the Boko Haram of tomorrow still remains a conundrum.
P90X – Ab Ripper X
Elrich was firmer in opposing the loitering bill (which he voted against in committee). It was “clearly something the police don’t want,” and “not a good cure for the problem.” Elrich spoke of “turning police officers into fictional characters who can discern ill intent and issue tickets based on the perception of ill intent,” adding “I don’t believe the police chief can imbue his officers with such magical powers and I wouldn’t ask him to try to do that.”
They're super cute though! And they clean very nicely when helped!﻿﻿
How the rotten souls get
She recently added beautiful new pillow covers:
There are currently no regional patent offices in the U.S.
Without further adieu, here’s the April Goal List:
I haven’t read any of the books myself and the selection is based entirely on the above criteria. I’ve prepared a poster for each book with a brief plot synopsis. It will be interesting to see which novel is selected.
You’re looking at the house my great-grandparents moved into in the early 1920s after they got married. They were immigrants from backwater towns in Calabria, in southern Italy, and they, like a lot of immigrants from their immediate vicinity, moved to the rust belt town of Kenosha, Wisconsin. You’ve probably heard its name but don’t know much about it. Nestled on the Lake Michigan coastline, Kenosha is equidistant from Milwaukee and Chicago. It’s the birthplace of minor celebrities such as actors Al Molinaro, Mark Ruffalo, and Don Ameche, and one major one, Orson Welles. In its day, Kenosha was a typical industrial port, churning out automobiles at Nash Motors, undergarments at Jockey, and brass rods and bars at American Brass, which was where my great-grandfather, Anthony Tenuta, worked. I don’t know exactly when they moved in to this house on 24th Avenue, just a few blocks from Columbus Park, but it was probably around 1921 or 1922 (it was known as Newell Street back then). The house is for sale now, and like Kenosha, it’s seen better days. Remarkably, once it’s sold, it will mark the end of a roughly 90-year period that it was in the Tenuta family.
The decorations in our house are down; the Christmas markets have been dismantled; and yet yesterday, for one day only, it was Christmas once again. For finally our big, annual box of Christmas goodies arrived. And there's nothing more fun than opening a giant box of presents you have already opened when you haven't seen them but have longed for them for ages* (*or just over a week which can seem like ages to a 3 and 4 year old.).
which I then moistened and stacked, trying to bring each "course" in just enough to get the corbelled dome effect. Once the domes were finished, I removed the candy doors and replaced them with a tin foil form.
This galvanized metal 3-tier stand from Pottery Barn is a favorite storage item in my craft room. It totally works with my *out in the open* method of storage. And going vertical is a great way to add storage to your crafting space. Whether it's stacking units, bins, baskets or shelves...use that vertical space to utilize more of your craft space real estate.
To a small sunlit space in front of our house
That's the beauty of music. You can sing about absolutely every aspect of the human condition. It can be factual, funny, sad, sexy....
Not a joke. If you have ever had anyone tickle you for a long period, or tickle hard, even though you may be laughing, it is painful, you can’t breathe, you shit and piss your pants…in Project Monarch, Talent, MARS, Artichoke, Termite and so on, they would put subjects through such painful beatings and rapes that the psyche would split….in Project Tickle, the CIA/NSA found that making a subject endure hours of horrendous tickling while restrained would cause the soul to leap out of the body. They would “capture” the soul in a container where they could perform experiments on the soul, or force a different soul into an empty body. Later, they would take a group of six children, force their souls out from the tickle torture, and then force five souls into one body. This was another method of placing many alters into one body. The soulless bodies were given to their reptoid overlords as food.
So I ended my Spring Break with a trip to the cinema to see Titanic, in Spanish. SO good. And so sad. It’s one of my favorites because you can remove yourself from the love story and immerse yourself in the tragic reality that the sinking of the Titanic was real. Anyway, good movie. Even though Spanish popcorn is sweet. Ugh.
I participated in my 2nd 5k on Saturday. Hip Hip Hooray! The Bearathon was on Saturday morning, bright and early at 7:00am. I had a really good time and I'm glad I did it. Spring Break really messed up my training schedule and my motivation wavered slightly, but I did it and I finished! This Baylor event is a huge thing on campus. Over 2,000 participated in either the 5k or half marathon.
This is a nice, no... A Great Halloween Horror flick. Why it's obscure I don't know, but it really shouldn't be. 9/10.
Hope you have a wonderful weekend.
You would be wrong.
Aiming for a simplistic look, since Jenny seems to wear little jewelry in her photo appearances, we have designed a healing stone necklace made of rose quartz for Jenny and of course we will send her a pair of our Golden Triangle Earrings just for a fun night out.
Then, Thumper upped the ante by claiming I hadn't made his favorite cheesecake "in like, forever." And the idea for a cheesecake, infiltrated with amorphous blobs of lemon curd was born. Far be it from me to impugn his request...
Thank you, Gillian!
26.What do you most value in your friends?
I want to bid a fond farewell to one of our own, The Tired Monk is taking a hiatus. I, for one will miss his voice. We can hope the Tired Monk will write a book. Let's hope he isn't too tired.
After 3 years I can finally say The Halsteadarian is finished (well part 1 is at the very least lol) having combined the original film, the extra scenes I made for the directors cut (Steam Cut) its sequel The Colne Engine and the satellite pieces (the animated comic strip and the history of Halstead) with some addition transitional scenes to make sense of the extras, the ‘short’ now weighs in at 37 minutes! So at least half way there for a feature film.
'Stand quite still, my dear. I want you to show you can concentrate. Put other distractions out of your mind. All the great singers have the ability to concentrate.'
Contact: Jerry Daday, (270) 745-8764.
I’ve got distracted from a beer related rant, so back to the point. From my earlier point regarding fixed and variable cost within manufacturing, there are 2 forms of accountancy usually done. Financial and Management. Again this is an over simplification. The financial accounts are a legal requirement and involve such delights as Profit and Loss statements and Balance Sheets. The purpose of which is to reveal whether the company made a profit and what the book value of the company is. Book value isn’t actual value, that’s market capitalisation, but that’s irrelevant.
I liked them. I think it is a feminist act to write Literary Erotica, and even more of a feminist act to sell a book of it. A bit like Anais Nin. I guess so. But sometimes I also feel like Dorothy Parker. That’s the truth. Actually I am trying to raise a chunk of money so that I can try and get a film made here. And this genre probably can raise the money.
Uh....this looks like a close call to me. I don't even know exactly when it happened. The burnt plug is an extension cord that had a box fan plugged in that has not been turned on for months. This plug-in is right by my bed and Sunny's condo (aka as my bedside table). Also the plug-in that the window A/C unit would have been plugged into if the A/C unit had been in use(wasn't).
consider an orange or an avocado,
The insane, crazy part of me says....
Here is the intro, but click over for more.
My absolute favorite is the jumping one. I don't care if I can't use it that often. I love it.
Why are such choices so overwhelming? Is it just me or does anyone else out there take forever to decide on colour samples? Or am I the only one who is so fussy?
Have a look at the rest of my blog
She takes out her tattoo kit and carves her signature butterfly into his shoulder blade. He’s not sure how this is going to help. Is he a horse that needs to be branded? She tells him that he’s something like that.
In an increasingly stressful and materialistic world, the age-old beliefs and practices of the Celts bring us back in tune with the magical forces of nature and the spirit world that surround us.
Please suggest other trickster books for kids in the comments! I'll list them here:
Serena
Meat, oysters, dark green leafy vegetables, legumes, enriched breads and cereals are example of foods that are rich in iron. You can also cook your food with cast iron pans to help with iron levels (I use my cast iron pan all the time!!)
not by our own
Visit Effie Yeaw Nature Center for a guided walk to see the animals and plants of the habitat. Don't forget your binoculars and camera.
Will Ferrell and Zach Galifianakis star as opposing candidates in a rural southern state where absolute insanity occurs.
We've been here before
with natural colorings in the foods they sell in Europe. Now Nestle is
MAC MSFN in Medium (I wouldn't use this on the actual day; I would use a full coverage foundation)
Anyway, the only vulnerable moments in which Iño and I were separated were when my mother washed him and when I would go to the park to hang out in the playground. I've been told by people older than myself that I was a fairly amiable and sensitive child who could at times be hyperactive but had an overall pleasant demeanor. In other words, these wholesome traits made me bully fodder and I was highly susceptible to accept any invitations to be abused by the neighborhood playground tyrants.
From the Archives:
Tuesday through Saturday- chance of rain each day with temperatures in the 50s.
Light soya sauce, 3 tablespoons
Of course, you do have to trust that whatever makes itself present for you is what you needed!!! Double check in your locket if you have doubt or are unsure. Feel it!!! Once you feel it, don’t question it just move forward with whatever is presented to you!!
I transferred to BYU from Dixie State my sophmore year to be roommates with my cousin. I signed up for a Biology class (which kicked my butt) and fell in love with the sciences. I was going to do something with Environmental Biology. What that meant, I didn't know, and I didn't care. I loved science.
The Temple. Oh how much I love the temple!!
Offenil laid the device into Guus’s hands and Guus handled it like he would a snake, half fearing it would meld into his own hands and disappear. Offenil looked concerned.
We spent a few hours walking, grabbed a quick lunch at The Park in Chelsea (they have “Garden Seating,” a tree in the middle of the dining room, a ricotta salada and beet salad, and serve banana bread with the meal – need I say more?), walked a little more, and then headed to visit my Grandma and meet up with the rest of my family for an early Mother’s Day dinner at our Riverdale staple – Nonno Tony’s (and yes, Nonno Tony knows my Grandma and the rest of my family, they go there so often). After stuffing ourselves with pizza and salad, B and I got dropped off at Penn Station and took the train up to Albany.
So I am wondering...
1 unnoticed
Onward is not just a book about coffee (although Schultz loves coffee), it is about love for a company and a leader who wanted to stay true to what that company was all about.
(I forgot to mention, fruits and vegetables were able to speak too.)
It’s that feeling when a song ends. That’s how I felt about love. When you first hear it, it is amazing. Your ears and brain can’t get enough. You don’t know how the artist described your life so perfectly, how it fit you so well. It doesn’t matter how you found it, only that you did. It’s your favorite sound, and it helps you sleep. But then time goes by, and that song, at one point or another, starts to change. It ends, and you’re stuck in your spot, the words sound different, the mean changes. That deafening silence. The hitting replay. But it doesn’t sound as wonderful the second time. And when it gets stuck in your head, you HAVE to listen to it. But when you do, it lets you down. If you hear it on the radio, if it’s a surprise, you say you love it. But if you make the choice to listen to it, you hate it after a few seconds. I mean sometimes, you want to repeat it over and over and over. Hoping beyond hope that it will never stop playing. It’s the only song that describes you, that gets you. It helps you get by every day, by also makes you unbelievably sad. It’s a fix, waiting for it to load is murder. But its nothing like a song. It simply… Its not simple at all.
I've been posting about my dad's medical issues and the lack of knowing what is actually wrong and if/when it will be fixed. So they decided it best to cancel our trip to Disney this coming November. It was going to me me and my hubby and our two kids and my mom and dad...dad's first trip ever I was so super excited that he'd FINALLY agreed to try it out.
Every so often, I like digging through old newspapers and discovering what was making the news on this day in years gone by. Here is a report from the Leeds Mercury of the 11th April 1862 - 150 year ago today - concerning a catalogue of disasters that occurred on the streets of Leeds.
“It really requires a major effort,” he said. “The United States and other countries should begin to get involved and try to help the Japanese government to expedite the removal of that spent fuel and to put it into dry, hardened storage as soon as possible.”
Splash of olive oil
In a not-too-distant future, the United States of America has collapsed, weakened by drought, fire, famine, and war, to be replaced by Panem, a country divided into the Capitol and 12 districts. Each year, two young representatives from each district are selected by lottery to participate in The Hunger Games. Part entertainment, part brutal intimidation of the subjugated districts, the televised games are broadcasted throughout Panem as the 24 participants are forced to eliminate their competitors, literally, with all citizens required to watch. When 16-year-old Katniss's young sister, Prim, is selected as the mining district's female representative, Katniss volunteers to take her place. She and her male counterpart, Peeta, the son of the town baker who seems to have all the fighting skills of a lump of bread dough, will be pitted against bigger, stronger representatives who have trained for this their whole lives.
Grandma Got Run Over By a Reindeer ... Cartoon Network (west) ... 7 PM
Cleaning, cooking, driving, showering, sitting. Music was her white noise. I’d see her moving about in the trails of her mundane activities with a look of warm, emotional, vacation. What was she thinking? Who did she miss? Where was she? How did she end up here? Very often, my dad would be simultaneously concocting his own cacophony in compulsed madness just ten feet below us. Though you could hear it, we didn’t. Not really.
Fine artist's brush
i then adhered the card front to a card base. this design could be used over and over with designer/washi tapes or scraps of papers you can not bring your heart to throw out.
Mohammed Karzai told Risen, "My relatives have told me they can't understand why I don't come over with them and get rich."
6. Once the wizard is done and the connector is created, you should see it in the EMC. Right click the new connector and go to the Permissions tab first. Select Anonymous and Exchange servers (You have to do this to allow Externally Secured Authentication to be a valid selection). You can also check whatever other groups you want as well.
I used Sentimentals for the butterfly. Word of caution: Do no cut this butterfly smaller than 2 inches! I had a heck of a time getting the antennae to cut out.
Her fingers twirled the end of my braid. "Mommy, I have a secret to tell you."
I took a look at my posts from last year in March today (before a live call-in gardening program) and saw that I'd remarked on unusually warm temperature at 75° F.
We should talk about my family. I don't think it would be completely out of line to perhaps have a candy dish of said alprazolam on hand for such stress-laden holiday events as Thanksgiving. I can't talk about the crazy parts of my family because that would be rude. Not that they read my blog. But anyway. It's rude to say your family is crazy. I'm pretty sure.
Day 2 - Shooting/Assignment day for all participants with real life couples! (this is a surprise! Be prepared to be challenged and pushed out of your comfort zones! :D )
One of my all time favorites sets is Her Expressions. So easy to use and work around. I just love how delicate it is.
1 long-held
I love to try a lot of different techniques but lately I’ve used a lot of heat embossing which I’ve fallen a bit in love with. and I love to create my own patterned paper with my stamps – but not sure that’s a technique (-: !
(303 Mariickville Rd Marrickville Sydney)
Almost all destinations have a high season and a low season; and if you are visiting during the high season, you’re probably going to pay a premium. If you’re willing to travel during the slow season or the shoulder season (in between) then you might be able to find some excellent values. Often vacation rental owners are willing to negotiate during the low season when a rental could go empty. For example, a rental along the Jersey Shore in the height of summer is expensive. But what about September? The weather is still beautiful enough to enjoy the beach, but the crowds are mostly gone.
Second, the members of the class lead a lot of the discussing. Their input was valuable and valued. This was important and proved that these men and women were growing in the Lord.
The drone strike that killed Quso was carried out by the CIA, after an extended surveillance operation by the CIA and U.S. military, two U.S. officials said. They spoke on condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to speak to the media.
You asked me brightly where i came from to your side
the little bag came from card craft inspirations,
Bloggers come out of the rain
At one point a quiet woman at the adjoining table tapped me on the shoulder. “I overheard you saying you are American,” she said. “We’ve seen what’s happening in New Orleans on TV, and we also know what day it is and what that means to you.” I suddenly realized I’d forgotten the date.
Book Blurb
To me, this is utterly fascinating. A few days ago, I walked you through the ages of the disciples chosen by Jesus and we concluded that all of them, with the exception of Peter, were under the age of 20. Now, when it comes time for Paul to chose his disciples, he continues the tradition of his day and the tradition of Jesus; and he selects another “kid.”
And no, it isn't much fun at all.
I received a copy of “Illusion” for review.
Jhumpa Lahiri, The Namesake – for a family member who lost his copy
With gas prices rising, many of us are looking for the best deals out there this spring season before price hikes occur this summer on airline fares, hotel rates and more.
"This is the Mother of God speaking. It is not to be a Jansenist to love penance and to live penitentially. Our Lady, the Mother of God herself, has told us that we must do penance, something she stressed in approved apparition after approved apparition, including her apparitions in the Cova da Iria near Fatima, Portugal, fifty-nine years after she appeared to the impoverished fourteen year-old Bernadette Soubirous as she was gathering wood near the River Gave not far from the Grotto of Massabielle. Shouldn't that be good enough for us.
4. Shouting Richee for tea, getting the response ‘I’ll be down in a minute’, and needing to shout for a second and third time. By which point tea is cold, and I’m pissed off.
Executrade -Your Recruitment Specialists
Young women today do not seem to aspire to pretty, they prefer to be regarded as hot. Hotness is something altogether different. When women want to be hot instead of pretty, they must view themselves in a certain way and consequently men view them differently as well.
A documentary produced by Kenji Ito of BGEA visualized what the tsunami was: terrible, destructive, sweeping—but also demonstrated what is one year later: rooted sadness, a rising sun, uplifted lives and love only delivered through Christ.
In each case in the latter two texts, we see that Antinous’ flower is cited as somehow surpassing the others because its memorial of its namesake is not as horrible as what came before, and that Antinous’ death was somehow more joyous or even redemptive, perhaps.
Winner will be anounced two weeks from today .. what is that? August 7th .. time .. whenever I wake up.
Anyone else out there relieved to pack away the holidays? The house always looks so large once the tree is down, and the holiday decor is safely packed away and out of sight for another year. However, the large space always leaves me feeling the urge for a change, and a fresh room. It'd be easy, given all the money in the world, to plan out a fresh new space. The trick though is to try a no cost makeover.
